{"8890379": ["Disease problems of salmonid fish in Japan caused by international trade.", "The author details the connection between disease outbreaks in salmonid fish and imports of salmonid eggs into Japan since the 1950s. The following diseases and species are involved: -infectious pancreatic necrosis in rainbow trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss) -infectious haematopoietic necrosis in sockeye ( of 'kokanee') salmon (O. nerka) and masu salmon (O. masu) -cold water disease, erythrocyte inclusion body syndrome, and bacterial kidney disease (caused by Renibacterium salmoninarum) in coho salmon (O. kisutch), ayu (Plecoglossus altivelis), rainbow trout and masu salmon. The author also discusses the strategies aimed at controlling the risk of disease spread through international trade in salmonid fish and fish products in Japan. Essential in these strategies are the following actions: -exchange of information on controlling disease problems -studies to establish standard methods to identify or detect fish pathogens -fish health certification.", "Department of Marine Bioresources Chemistry, Faculty of Fisheries, Hokkaido University, Japan."], "11299044": ["A tandem repeats database for bacterial genomes: application to the genotyping of Yersinia pestis and Bacillus anthracis.", "Some pathogenic bacteria are genetically very homogeneous, making strain discrimination difficult. In the last few years, tandem repeats have been increasingly recognized as markers of choice for genotyping a number of pathogens. The rapid evolution of these structures appears to contribute to the phenotypic flexibility of pathogens. The availability of whole-genome sequences has opened the way to the systematic evaluation of tandem repeats diversity and application to epidemiological studies.This report presents a database (http://minisatellites.u-psud.fr) of tandem repeats from publicly available bacterial genomes which facilitates the identification and selection of tandem repeats. We illustrate the use of this database by the characterization of minisatellites from two important human pathogens, Yersinia pestis and Bacillus anthracis. In order to avoid simple sequence contingency loci which may be of limited value as epidemiological markers, and to provide genotyping tools amenable to ordinary agarose gel electrophoresis, only tandem repeats with repeat units at least 9 bp long were evaluated. Yersinia pestis contains 64 such minisatellites in which the unit is repeated at least 7 times. An additional collection of 12 loci with at least 6 units, and a high internal conservation were also evaluated. Forty-nine are polymorphic among five Yersinia strains (twenty-five among three Y. pestis strains). Bacillus anthracis contains 30 comparable structures in which the unit is repeated at least 10 times. Half of these tandem repeats show polymorphism among the strains tested.Analysis of the currently available bacterial genome sequences classifies Bacillus anthracis and Yersinia pestis as having an average (approximately 30 per Mb) density of tandem repeat arrays longer than 100 bp when compared to the other bacterial genomes analysed to date. In both cases, testing a fraction of these sequences for polymorphism was sufficient to quickly develop a set of more than fifteen informative markers, some of which show a very high degree of polymorphism. In one instance, the polymorphism information content index reaches 0.82 with allele length covering a wide size range (600-1950 bp), and nine alleles resolved in the small number of independent Bacillus anthracis strains typed here.", "Centre d'Etudes du Bouchet, BP3, 91710 Vert le Petit, France. lefleche@igmors.u-psud.fr"], "11886745": ["Genetic relationships of Bacillus anthracis and closely related species based on variable-number tandem repeat analysis and BOX-PCR genomic fingerprinting.", "Variable-number tandem repeats (VNTR) analysis and BOX-repeat-based PCR (BOX-PCR) genomic fingerprinting were performed on 25 Bacillus strains to investigate the genetic relatedness of Bacillus anthracis to the closely related species. Based on VNTR analysis, all B. anthracis strains could be assigned to (VNTR)(4), which is the most commonly found type in the world. Interestingly, a (VNTR)(2) was also observed in Bacillus cereus KCTC 1661 and with an exact match to the tandem repeats found in B. anthracis. This finding has never been reported before in the closely related species. According to the BOX-PCR, B. anthracis strains clustered together and separated reliably from the closely related species. However, B. cereus KCTC 1661 was linked to the B. anthracis cluster and showed close relationships with B. anthracis strains. These results indicated that there was a strong correlation between VNTR analysis and BOX-PCR genomic fingerprinting.", "Department of Microbiology, Chung-Ang University College of Medicine and Institute of Medical Research, Seoul 156-756, South Korea."], "14715089": ["Identification of polymorphic tandem repeats by direct comparison of genome sequence from different bacterial strains: a web-based resource.", "Polymorphic tandem repeat typing is a new generic technology which has been proved to be very efficient for bacterial pathogens such as B. anthracis, M. tuberculosis, P. aeruginosa, L. pneumophila, Y. pestis. The previously developed tandem repeats database takes advantage of the release of genome sequence data for a growing number of bacteria to facilitate the identification of tandem repeats. The development of an assay then requires the evaluation of tandem repeat polymorphism on well-selected sets of isolates. In the case of major human pathogens, such as S. aureus, more than one strain is being sequenced, so that tandem repeats most likely to be polymorphic can now be selected in silico based on genome sequence comparison.In addition to the previously described general Tandem Repeats Database, we have developed a tool to automatically identify tandem repeats of a different length in the genome sequence of two (or more) closely related bacterial strains. Genome comparisons are pre-computed. The results of the comparisons are parsed in a database, which can be conveniently queried over the internet according to criteria of practical value, including repeat unit length, predicted size difference, etc. Comparisons are available for 16 bacterial species, and the orthopox viruses, including the variola virus and three of its close neighbors.We are presenting an internet-based resource to help develop and perform tandem repeats based bacterial strain typing. The tools accessible at http://minisatellites.u-psud.fr now comprise four parts. The Tandem Repeats Database enables the identification of tandem repeats across entire genomes. The Strain Comparison Page identifies tandem repeats differing between different genome sequences from the same species. The \"Blast in the Tandem Repeats Database\" facilitates the search for a known tandem repeat and the prediction of amplification product sizes. The \"Bacterial Genotyping Page\" is a service for strain identification at the subspecies level.", "Laboratoire GPMS, Institut de G\u00e9n\u00e9tique et Microbiologie, Bat 400, Universit\u00e9 Paris-Sud, 91405 Orsay cedex, France. France.Denoeud@igmors.u-psud.fr"], "16085861": ["Molecular characterization of Korean Bacillus anthracis isolates by amplified fragment length polymorphism analysis and multilocus variable-number tandem repeat analysis.", "We analyzed the genetic relationships and molecular characteristics of 34 Bacillus anthracis isolates from soil and clinical samples in various regions of Korea and 17 related Bacillus species, using the amplified fragment length polymorphism (AFLP) and multilocus variable-number tandem repeat (MLVA) approaches. Triplicate AFLP profiles of these strains showed high reproducibility and identified 376 polymorphisms. AFLP phylogenetic analysis of B. anthracis isolates showed a high level of similarity, 0.93, and this monomorphic fragment profile proved to be useful to differentiate B. anthracis strains from other Bacillus species. The B. cereus group was separated from other Bacillus species at a level of similarity of 0.68. Among them, some B. cereus strains showed genetic interspersion with B. thuringiensis strains. The evolutionary pattern of nucleotide differences among B. anthracis strains with the eight MLVA markers showed nine MLVA types. Three MLVA types, M1 to M3, were pathogenic B. anthracis isolates and were assigned as new genotypes belonging to the A4 and B3 clusters, compared with 89 genotypes deduced from previous data. This indicates that differences in cluster prevalence and distribution may be influenced more by MLVA markers on two plasmids loci and human activity. Consequently, we suggest that the novel MLVA type may represent significant evidence for historic adaptation to environmental conditions of the Asian continent, particularly Korea. Therefore, MLVA techniques may be available for molecular monitoring on anthrax-release-related bioterrorism and further study is required for the continuous epidemiological study of variable anthrax collections.", "Department of Bacteriology, National Institute of Health, 5-Nokbeon-dong, Eunpyeong-gu, Seoul 122-701, South Korea."], "16318690": ["New measles genotype, Uganda.", "We report the first genetic characterization of wildtype measles viruses from Uganda. Thirty-six virus isolates from outbreaks in 6 districts were analyzed from 2000 to 2002. Analyses of sequences of the nucleoprotein (N) and hemagglutinin (H) genes showed that the Ugandan isolates were all closely related, and phylogenetic analysis indicated that these viruses were members of a unique group within clade D. Sequences of the Ugandan viruses were not closely related to any of the World Health Organization reference sequences representing the 22 currently recognized genotypes. The minimum nucleotide divergence between the Ugandan viruses and the most closely related reference strain, genotype D2, was 3.1% for the N gene and 2.6% for the H gene. Therefore, Ugandan viruses should be considered a new, proposed genotype (d10). This new sequence information will expand the utility of molecular epidemiologic techniques for describing measles transmission patterns in eastern Africa.", "Uganda Virus Research Institute, Entebbe, Uganda."], "18230125": ["Fieldable genotyping of Bacillus anthracis and Yersinia pestis based on 25-loci Multi Locus VNTR Analysis.", "Anthrax and plague are diseases caused by Bacillus anthracis and Yersinia pestis respectively. These bacteria are etiological agents for worldwide zoonotic diseases and are considered among the most feared potential bioterror agents. Strain differentiation is difficult for these microorganisms because of their high intraspecies genome homogeneity. Moreover, fast strain identification and comparison with known genotypes may be crucial for naturally occurring outbreaks versus bioterrorist events discrimination.Thirty-nine B. anthracis and ten Y. pestis strains, representative of the species genetic diversity, were genotyped by Agilent 2100 Bioanalyzer using previously described Multiple Locus VNTR Analysis assays (MLVA). Results were compared to previous data obtained by standard genotyping system (capillary electrophoresis on automatic sequencer) and, when necessary, direct amplicon sequencing. A reference comparison table containing actual fragment sizes, sequencer sizes and Agilent sizes was produced.In this report an automated DNA electrophoresis apparatus which provides a cheaper alternative compared to capillary electrophoresis approaches was applied for genotyping of B. anthracis and Y. pestis. This equipment, uses pre-cast gels and provides easy transportation, low maintenance and overall general logistic requirements and costs, is easy to set up and provides rapid analysis. This platform is a candidate for on-site MLVA genotyping of biothreat agents as well as other bacterial pathogens. It is an alternative to the more expensive and demanding capillary electrophoresis methods, and to the less expensive but more time-consuming classical gel electrophoresis approach.", "Histology and Molecular Biology Section, Army Medical Research Center, Via Santo Stefano Rotondo 4, 00184 Rome, Italy. andrea.ciammaruconi@gmail.com"], "18650364": ["Novel multiple-locus variable-number tandem-repeat analysis method for rapid molecular typing of human Staphylococcus aureus.", "We evaluated the use of a novel multiple-locus variable-number tandem-repeat analysis (MLVA) method for typing of human Staphylococcus aureus. For a total of 150 clinical isolates, MLVA demonstrated the highest discriminatory power. MLVA correctly assigned isolates to outbreaks or identified isolates as unlinked. MLVA is a rapid and simple method for the epidemiological typing of S. aureus.", "Department of Medical Microbiology, University Medical Centre Utrecht, Utrecht, The Netherlands."], "19368722": ["Bacillus anthracis in China and its relationship to worldwide lineages.", "The global pattern of distribution of 1033 B. anthracis isolates has previously been defined by a set of 12 conserved canonical single nucleotide polymorphisms (canSNP). These studies reinforced the presence of three major lineages and 12 sub-lineages and sub-groups of this anthrax-causing pathogen. Isolates that form the A lineage (unlike the B and C lineages) have become widely dispersed throughout the world and form the basis for the geographical disposition of \"modern\" anthrax. An archival collection of 191 different B. anthracis isolates from China provides a glimpse into the possible role of Chinese trade and commerce in the spread of certain sub-lineages of this pathogen. Canonical single nucleotide polymorphism (canSNP) and multiple locus VNTR analysis (MLVA) typing has been used to examine this archival collection of isolates.The canSNP study indicates that there are 5 different sub-lineages/sub-groups in China out of 12 previously described world-wide canSNP genotypes. Three of these canSNP genotypes were only found in the western-most province of China, Xinjiang. These genotypes were A.Br.008/009, a sub-group that is spread across most of Europe and Asia; A.Br.Aust 94, a sub-lineage that is present in Europe and India, and A.Br.Vollum, a lineage that is also present in Europe. The remaining two canSNP genotypes are spread across the whole of China and belong to sub-group A.Br.001/002 and the A.Br.Ames sub-lineage, two closely related genotypes. MLVA typing adds resolution to the isolates in each canSNP genotype and diversity indices for the A.Br.008/009 and A.Br.001/002 sub-groups suggest that these represent older and established clades in China.B. anthracis isolates were recovered from three canSNP sub-groups (A.Br.008/009, A.Br.Aust94, and A.Br.Vollum) in the western most portion of the large Chinese province of Xinjiang. The city of Kashi in this province appears to have served as a crossroads for not only trade but the movement of diseases such as anthrax along the ancient \"silk road\". Phylogenetic inference also suggests that the A.Br.Ames sub-lineage, first identified in the original Ames strain isolated from Jim Hogg County, TX, is descended from the A.Br.001/002 sub-group that has a major presence in most of China. These results suggest a genetic discontinuity between the younger Ames sub-lineage in Texas and the large Western North American sub-lineage spread across central Canada and the Dakotas.", "Department of Biological Sciences, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, AZ 86011-5640, USA. Tatum.Simonson@utah.edu"], "19543392": ["Genotyping and phylogenetic analysis of Yersinia pestis by MLVA: insights into the worldwide expansion of Central Asia plague foci.", "The species Yersinia pestis is commonly divided into three classical biovars, Antiqua, Medievalis, and Orientalis, belonging to subspecies pestis pathogenic for human and the (atypical) non-human pathogenic biovar Microtus (alias Pestoides) including several non-pestis subspecies. Recent progress in molecular typing methods enables large-scale investigations in the population structure of this species. It is now possible to test hypotheses about its evolution which were proposed decades ago. For instance the three classical biovars of different geographical distributions were suggested to originate from Central Asia. Most investigations so far have focused on the typical pestis subspecies representatives found outside of China, whereas the understanding of the emergence of this human pathogen requires the investigation of strains belonging to subspecies pestis from China and to the Microtus biovar.Multi-locus VNTR analysis (MLVA) with 25 loci was performed on a collection of Y. pestis isolates originating from the majority of the known foci worldwide and including typical rhamnose-negative subspecies pestis as well as rhamnose-positive subspecies pestis and biovar Microtus. More than 500 isolates from China, the Former Soviet Union (FSU), Mongolia and a number of other foci around the world were characterized and resolved into 350 different genotypes. The data revealed very close relationships existing between some isolates from widely separated foci as well as very high diversity which can conversely be observed between nearby foci.The results obtained are in full agreement with the view that the Y. pestis subsp. pestis pathogenic for humans emerged in the Central Asia region between China, Kazakhstan, Russia and Mongolia, only three clones of which spread out of Central Asia. The relationships among the strains in China, Central Asia and the rest of the world based on the MLVA25 assay provide an unprecedented view on the expansion and microevolution of Y. pestis.", "Laboratory of Analytical Microbiology, State Key Laboratory of Pathogen and Biosecurity, Institute of Microbiology and Epidemiology, Beijing, China."], "19679889": ["Support for smoke-free policies among smokers and non-smokers in six cities in China: ITC China Survey.", "To examine levels of support for comprehensive smoke-free policies in six large Chinese cities.Data from Wave 1 of the International Tobacco Control (ITC) China Survey (April-August 2006) were analysed. The ITC China Survey employed a multistage sampling design in Beijing, Shenyang, Shanghai, Changsha, Guangzhou and Yinchuan (none of which has comprehensive smoke-free policies in place). Face-to-face interviews were conducted with 4815 smokers and 1270 non-smokers. Multivariate logistic regression models were used to identify factors associated with support for comprehensive smoke-free policies.About one in two Chinese urban smokers and four in five non-smokers believed that secondhand smoke (SHS) causes lung cancer. The majority of respondents supported comprehensive smoke-free policies in hospitals, schools and public transport vehicles while support for smoke-free workplaces, restaurants and bars was lower. Levels of support were generally comparable between smokers and non-smokers. Support for comprehensive smoke-free policies was positively associated with knowledge about the harm of SHS. Respondents who worked in a smoke-free worksite or who frequented smoke-free indoor entertainment places were more likely to support comprehensive smoking restriction in bars and restaurants.Considerable support for smoke-free policies exists in these six large cities in China. Greater public education about the dangers of SHS may further increase support. Experiencing the benefits of smoke-free indoor entertainment places and/or workplaces increases support for these policies and suggests that some initial smoke-free policy implementation may hasten the diffusion of these public health policies.", "National Center for Chronic and Non-communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, 27 Nanwei Road, Beijing, P R China. Qangli33@yahoo.com"], "19775435": ["MLVA distribution characteristics of Yersinia pestis in China and the correlation analysis.", "Yersinia pestis, the aetiological agent of plague, has been well defined genotypically on local and worldwide scales. In November 2005, five cases of severe pneumonia of unknown causes, resulting in two deaths, were reported in Yulong, Yunnan province. In this study, we compared Y. pestis isolated from the Yulong focus to strains from other areas.Two hundred and thirteen Y. pestis strains collected from different plague foci in China and a live attenuated vaccine strain of Y. pestis (EV76) were genotyped using multiple-locus variable-number tandem repeat analysis (MLVA) on 14 loci. A total of 214 Y. pestis strains were divided into 85 MLVA types, and Nei's genetic diversity indices of the various loci ranged between 0.02 - 0.76. Minimum spanning tree analysis showed that Y. pestis in China could be divided into six complexes. It was observed that Microtus strains were different from the other three biovar strains. Each plague focus had its own unique MLVA types.The strains isolated from Yulong, Yunnan province had a unique MLVA type, indicating a new clone group. Our results suggest that Yulong strains may have a close relationship with strains from the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau plague focus.", "National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, and State Key Laboratory for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing 102206, PR China. zhangxiaoai_0922@163.com"], "20507744": ["New measles virus genotype associated with outbreak, China.", "To determine the origin of the virus associated with a measles outbreak in Menglian County, Yunnan Province, People's Republic of China, in 2009, we conducted genetic analyses. Phylogenetic analyses based on nucleoprotein (N) and hemagglutinin (H) gene sequences showed that these Menglian viruses were not closely related to sequences of any World Health Organization (WHO) reference strains representing the 23 currently recognized genotypes. The minimum nucleotide divergence between the Menglian viruses and the most closely related reference strain, genotype D7, was 3.3% for the N gene and 3.0% for the H gene. A search of the databases of GenBank, WHO, and the Health Protection Agency Measles Nucleotide Surveillance showed that the Menglian viruses, together with the 2 older non-Menglian viruses, could be members of a new proposed measles genotype, d11. The new genotype designation will allow for better description of measles transmission patterns, especially in the Southeast Asian and Western Pacific regions.", "National Institute for Viral Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, People's Republic of China."], "22844129": ["Phase II study of single-agent bevacizumab in Japanese patients with recurrent malignant glioma.", "This single-arm, open-label, Phase II study evaluated the efficacy and safety of single-agent bevacizumab, a monoclonal antibody against vascular endothelial growth factor, in Japanese patients with recurrent malignant glioma.Patients with histologically confirmed, measurable glioblastoma or World Health Organization Grade III glioma, previously treated with temozolomide plus radiotherapy, received 10 mg/kg bevacizumab intravenous infusion every 2 weeks. The primary endpoint was 6-month progression-free survival in the patients with recurrent glioblastoma.Of the 31 patients enrolled, 29 (93.5%) had glioblastoma and 2 (6.5%) had Grade III glioma. Eleven (35.5%) patients were receiving corticosteroids at baseline; 17 (54.8%) and 14 (45.2%) patients had experienced one or two relapses, respectively. The 6-month progression-free survival rate in the 29 patients with recurrent glioblastoma was 33.9% (90% confidence interval, 19.2-48.5) and the median progression-free survival was 3.3 months. The 1-year survival rate was 34.5% with a median overall survival of 10.5 months. There were eight responders (all partial responses) giving an objective response rate of 27.6%. The disease control rate was 79.3%. Eight of the 11 patients taking corticosteroids at baseline reduced their dose or discontinued corticosteroids during the study. Bevacizumab was well-tolerated and Grade \u22653 adverse events of special interest to bevacizumab were as follows: hypertension [3 (9.7%) patients], congestive heart failure [1 (3.2%) patient] and venous thromboembolism [1 (3.2%) patient]. One asymptomatic Grade 1 cerebral hemorrhage was observed, which resolved without treatment.Single-agent bevacizumab provides clinical benefit for Japanese patients with recurrent glioblastoma.", "Department of Neurosurgery, Kyorin University Faculty of Medicine, 6-20-2 Shinkawa, Mitaka, Tokyo, Japan. nagane-nsu@umin.ac.jp"], "23618500": ["Concurrent bevacizumab and temozolomide alter the patterns of failure in radiation treatment of glioblastoma multiforme.", "We investigated the pattern of failure in glioblastoma multiforma (GBM) patients treated with concurrent radiation, bevacizumab (BEV), and temozolomide (TMZ). Previous studies demonstrated a predominantly in-field pattern of failure for GBM patients not treated with concurrent BEV.We reviewed the treatment of 23 patients with GBM who received 30 fractions of simultaneous integrated boost IMRT. PTV60 received 2 Gy daily to the tumor bed or residual tumor while PTV54 received 1.8 Gy daily to the surrounding edema. Concurrent TMZ (75 mg/m^2) daily and BEV (10 mg/kg every 2 weeks) were given during radiation therapy. One month after RT completion, adjuvant TMZ (150 mg/m^2 \u00d7 5 days) and BEV were delivered monthly until progression or 12 months total.With a median follow-up of 12 months, the median disease-free and overall survival were not reached. Four patients discontinued therapy due to toxicity for the following reasons: bone marrow suppression (2), craniotomy wound infection (1), and pulmonary embolus (1). Five patients had grade 2 or 3 hypertension managed by oral medications. Of the 12 patients with tumor recurrence, 7 suffered distant failure with either subependymal (5/12; 41%) or deep white matter (2/12; 17%) spread detected on T2 FLAIR sequences. Five of 12 patients (41%) with a recurrence demonstrated evidence of GAD enhancement. The patterns of failure did not correlate with extent of resection or number of adjuvant cycles.Treatment of GBM patients with concurrent radiation, BEV, and TMZ was well tolerated in the current study. The majority of patients experienced an out-of-field pattern of failure with radiation, BEV, and TMZ which has not been previously reported. Further investigation is warranted to determine whether BEV alters the underlying tumor biology to improve survival. These data may indicate that the currently used clinical target volume thought to represent microscopic disease for radiation may not be appropriate in combination with TMZ and BEV.", ""], "24081946": ["Randomized multicenter phase II trial comparing two schedules of etirinotecan pegol (NKTR-102) in women with recurrent platinum-resistant/refractory epithelial ovarian cancer.", "Etirinotecan pegol (NKTR-102) is a unique, long-acting topoisomerase-I inhibitor with prolonged systemic exposure to SN38 (7-ethyl-10-hydroxycamptothecin), the active metabolite of irinotecan. This randomized phase II trial investigated two dosing schedules of etirinotecan pegol in patients with platinum-resistant/refractory ovarian carcinoma.A total of 71 eligible patients were randomly assigned to receive etirinotecan pegol 145 mg/m(2) every 14 or 21 days until progression or unacceptable adverse events (AEs). The primary end point was objective response rate (ORR) by RECIST (version 1.0). Secondary end points included response by Gynecologic Cancer Intergroup criteria, duration of ORR, progression-free survival (PFS), and overall survival (OS).The overall confirmed ORR was 20% (95% CI, 10% to 30%): 20% for once every 14 days, and 19% for once every 21 days. Median response duration was 4.1 months for once every 14 days and 4.0 months for once every 21 days. Median PFS for every 14 and every 21 days was 4.1 and 5.3 months, respectively, and median OS was 10.0 and 11.7 months, respectively. Etirinotecan pegol was well tolerated, with the most common grade 3 to 4 AEs being dehydration (24%) and diarrhea (23%). Diarrhea, dehydration, nausea, and neutropenia were less frequent with the schedule of once every 21 days than with that of once every 14 days.Both schedules of etirinotecan pegol showed activity in patients with heavily pretreated ovarian cancer, with encouraging ORR and PFS rates. The schedule of once every 21 days was better tolerated and had slightly longer PFS and OS rates. The treatment schedule of etirinotecan pegol 145 mg/m(2) once every 21 days was selected for the expanded phase II study and is preferred for future phase III studies. These findings provide support to directly compare etirinotecan pegol versus one of the approved drugs (eg, pegylated liposomal doxorubicin or topotecan) in platinum-resistant ovarian cancer.", "Ignace B. Vergote, University Hospital Leuven, Leuven; Christine Gennigens, Centre Hospitalier Universitaire de Li\u00e8ge, Li\u00e8ge; Luc Y. Dirix, Gasthuis Zusters Antwerpen, Antwerp, Belgium; Agustin Garcia, University of Southern California Norris Comprehensive Cancer Center and Hospital, Los Angeles; John Micha, Gynecologic Oncology Associates, Newport Beach; Emad N. Ibrahim, Beaver Medical Group, Redlands; Abraham C.F. Leung, Carol Zhao, and Raoudha Soufi-Mahjoubi, Nektar Therapeutics, San Francisco, CA; Charles Pippitt, Piedmont Hematology Oncology Associates, Winston Salem, NC; Johanna Bendell, Sarah Cannon Research Institute, Nashville, TN; Daniel Spitz, Palm Beach Cancer Institute, West Palm Beach, FL; Nicholas Reed, Beatson Oncology Centre, Glasgow; Graham Dark, Freeman Hospital, Newcastle upon Tyne; Chris Poole, University Hospital Coventry, Coventry; Gordon Rustin, Mount Vernon Hospital, Northwood, United Kingdom; Paula M. Fracasso and Linda Duska, University of Virginia Health System, Charlottesville, VA; and Vincent A. Armenio, Pharma Resource, Providence, RI."], "25228814": ["Bevacizumab in Japanese patients with malignant glioma: from basic research to clinical trial.", "An antiangiogenic approach is especially suitable for the treatment of malignant gliomas. Recently, two large clinical trials in newly diagnosed glioblastoma (the Avastin in Glioblastoma study and Radiation Therapy Oncology Group 0825 study) showed a 3- to 4-month prolongation of progression-free survival (PFS) with bevacizumab, but no significant effect on overall survival (OS). Japan is the first, and so far only, country to approve the use of bevacizumab in newly diagnosed glioblastoma in combination with radiotherapy and temozolomide chemotherapy. The drug is also approved for use as monotherapy for recurrent glioblastoma and certain other types of high-grade glioma after previous therapy. The effectiveness of bevacizumab on Japanese malignant glioma patients was reviewed. The Phase II clinical trial demonstrated that the PFS with bevacizumab alone was 34% at 6 months and 3.3 months at median for 32 patients with recurrent malignant gliomas. In the Avastin in Glioblastoma study, 44 Japanese patients were registered from Japan. PFS and OS for bevacizumab combined with standard temozolomide and radiotherapy were 12.2 months and 29.2 months at median, respectively, for the patients with newly diagnosed glioblastoma. PFS and OS tended to be longer for those treated with bevacizumab than for those not treated with the drug. In addition, biomarkers of bevacizumab effectiveness were investigated in Japanese patients. Vascular endothelial growth factor concentration, matrix metalloproteinase 9 activities in urine, and apparent diffusion coefficient values on magnetic resonance imaging may be biomarkers that predict patient prognosis. Finally, novel experiments for vascular endothelial growth factor antibody action were described; these include the induction of glioma cell apoptosis, an antibody treatment failure model, and a study of the synergistic effect with chemotherapeutic agents. ", "Department of Neurosurgery, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan.Department of Radiology, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Faculty of Medicine, University of Tsukuba, Tsukuba, Japan."], "25266919": ["'Candidatus Rickettsia asemboensis' and Wolbachia spp. in Ctenocephalides felis and Pulex irritans fleas removed from dogs in Ecuador.", "Flea-borne infections are distributed worldwide. Up to date there are no reports about microorganisms associated to fleas in Ecuador.Seventy-one Pulex irritans and 8 Ctenocephalides felis fleas were removed from dogs in two Ecuadorian areas (Pastaza and Chimborazo Provinces) in December 2012. DNA extracts were tested by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assays targeting universal 16S rRNA, as well as screened for the presence of Rickettsia spp. (gltA, htrA, ompB, sca4 and ompA genes) and Bartonella spp. (rpoB, gltA and ITS genes).Our results showed the presence of 'Candidatus Rickettsia asemboensis' (highly similar to R. felis) in C. felis and Wolbachia spp. endosimbionts in P. irritans collected from animals in Ecuador. No fleas were found to be positive for any Bartonella species or Yersinia pestis.Clinicians should be aware of the potential risk of this new Candidatus Rickettsia sp. and keep in mind other flea-borne infections since these flea species frequently bite humans.", "Departamento de Enfermedades Infecciosas, Hospital San Pedro-Centro de Investigaci\u00f3n Biom\u00e9dica de La Rioja (CIBIR), C/ Piqueras 98, Logro\u00f1o (La Rioja), 26006, Spain. jaoteo@riojasalud.es."], "25477419": ["Genomic diversification in strains of Rickettsia felis Isolated from different arthropods.", "Rickettsia felis (Alphaproteobacteria: Rickettsiales) is the causative agent of an emerging flea-borne rickettsiosis with worldwide occurrence. Originally described from the cat flea, Ctenocephalides felis, recent reports have identified R. felis from other flea species, as well as other insects and ticks. This diverse host range for R. felis may indicate an underlying genetic variability associated with host-specific strains. Accordingly, to determine a potential genetic basis for host specialization, we sequenced the genome of R. felis str. LSU-Lb, which is an obligate mutualist of the parthenogenic booklouse Liposcelis bostrychophila (Insecta: Psocoptera). We also sequenced the genome of R. felis str. LSU, the second genome sequence for cat flea-associated strains (cf. R. felis str. URRWXCal2), which are presumably facultative parasites of fleas. Phylogenomics analysis revealed R. felis str. LSU-Lb diverged from the flea-associated strains. Unexpectedly, R. felis str. LSU was found to be divergent from R. felis str. URRWXCal2, despite sharing similar hosts. Although all three R. felis genomes contain the pRF plasmid, R. felis str. LSU-Lb carries an additional unique plasmid, pLbaR (plasmid of L. bostrychophila associated Rickettsia), nearly half of which encodes a unique 23-gene integrative conjugative element. Remarkably, pLbaR also encodes a repeats-in-toxin-like type I secretion system and associated toxin, heretofore unknown from other Rickettsiales genomes, which likely originated from lateral gene transfer with another obligate intracellular parasite of arthropods, Cardinium (Bacteroidetes). Collectively, our study reveals unexpected genomic diversity across three R. felis strains and identifies several diversifying factors that differentiate facultative parasites of fleas from obligate mutualists of booklice. ", "Department of Microbiology and Immunology, University of Maryland School of Medicine, Baltimore, Maryland jgillespie@som.umaryland.edu.Department of Biology, Western Carolina University.Department of Pathobiological Sciences, Louisiana State University, School of Veterinary Medicine.Department of Pathobiological Sciences, Louisiana State University, School of Veterinary Medicine.Department of Entomology, Louisiana State University Agricultural Center, Baton Rouge, Louisiana.Department of Pathobiological Sciences, Louisiana State University, School of Veterinary Medicine.Department of Microbiology and Immunology, University of Maryland School of Medicine, Baltimore, Maryland.Department of Pathobiological Sciences, Louisiana State University, School of Veterinary Medicine."], "25625931": ["The evolution of the EGFRvIII (rindopepimut) immunotherapy for glioblastoma multiforme patients.", "Glioblastoma Multiforme (GBM) is the most common type of brain tumor and it is uniformly fatal. The community standard of treatment for this disease is gross or subtotal resection of the tumor, followed by radiation and temozolomide. At recurrence bevacizumab can be added for increased progression free survival. Many challenges are encountered while trying to devise new drugs to treat GBM, such as the presence of the blood brain barrier which is impermeable to most drugs. Therefore in the past few years attention was turned to immunological means for the treatment of this devastating disease. EGFRvIII targeting has proven a good way to attack glioblastoma cells by using the immune system. Although in still in development, this approach holds the promise as a great first step toward immune-tailored drugs for the treatment of brain cancers. ", "a Department of Neurological Surgery ; University of California, Irvine ; Orange , CA USA."], "25649069": ["Guideline for veterinary practitioners on canine ehrlichiosis and anaplasmosis in Europe.", "Canine ehrlichiosis and anaplasmosis are important tick-borne diseases with a worldwide distribution. Information has been continuously collected on these infections in Europe, and publications have increased in recent years. Prevalence rates are high for Ehrlichia and Anaplasma spp. infections in dogs from different European countries. The goal of this article was to provide a practical guideline for veterinary practitioners on the diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of ehrlichiosis and anaplasmosis in dogs from Europe. This guideline is intended to answer the most common questions on these diseases from a practical point of view. ", "Department of Animal Medicine and Surgery, Veterinary Clinic Hospital, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Universidad Complutense de Madrid, Madrid, Spain. angelehr@vet.ucm.es.Hospital Clinic Veterinari, Universitat Aut\u00f2noma de Barcelona, Barcelona, Spain. Xavier.Roura@uab.cat.Department of Animal Health, Veterinary Clinic Hospital, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Universidad Complutense de Madrid, Madrid, Spain. gmiro@ucm.es.Department of Animal Pathology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, University of Zaragoza, Zaragoza, Spain. aestrada@unizar.es.Small Animal Clinic, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Freie Universit\u00e4t Berlin, Berlin, Germany. Barbara.Kohn@fu-berlin.de.Koret School of Veterinary Medicine, The Hebrew University of Jerusalem, Rehovot, Israel. shimon.harrus@mail.huji.ac.il.Departament de Medicina i Cirurgia Animal, Facultat de Veterinaria, Universitat Aut\u00f2noma de Barcelona, Bellaterra, Spain. Laia.Solano@uab.cat."], "25863554": ["Increasing human papillomavirus vaccine initiation among publicly insured Florida adolescents.", "We evaluated the feasibility of a multilevel intervention to increase the human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine initiation among adolescents.We used a four-arm factorial, quasi-experimental trial to assess feasibility and short-term, preliminary effectiveness of a health system-level, gender-specific postcard campaign and an in-clinic health information technology (HIT) system. Between August and November 2013, we tested the intervention among 11- to 17-year-olds without prior HPV vaccine claims in the Florida Medicaid or Children's Health Insurance Program encounters (2,773 girls and 3,350 boys) who attended or were assigned to primary care clinics in North Central Florida.At least one postcard was deliverable to 95% of the parents. Most parents (91% boys' and 80% girls') who participated in the process evaluation survey (n = 162) reported seeking additional information about the vaccine after receiving the postcard. Only 8% (57 of 1,062) of the adolescents assigned to a HIT provider with an office visit during the study used the HIT system. When compared with arms not containing that component, HPV vaccine initiation increased with the postcard campaign (girls, odds ratio [OR] = 1.6; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 1.1-2.3 and boys, not significant), the HIT system (girls, OR = 1.5; 95% CI = 1.0-2.3 and boys, OR = 1.4; 95% CI = 1.0-2.0), and the combined HIT and postcard intervention (girls, OR = 2.4; 95% CI = 1.4-4.3 and boys, OR = 1.6; 95% CI = 1.0-2.5).A system-level postcard campaign was feasible. Despite low recruitment to the in-clinic HIT system, the intervention demonstrated short-term, preliminary effectiveness similar to prior HPV vaccine interventions.", "Department of Health Outcomes and Policy, College of Medicine, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Institute for Child Health Policy, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida. Electronic address: sstaras@ufl.edu.Health Outcomes and Behavior Program, H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center, Tampa, Florida.Department of Health Outcomes and Policy, College of Medicine, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Institute for Child Health Policy, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida.Department of Health Outcomes and Policy, College of Medicine, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Institute for Child Health Policy, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Department of Pediatrics, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida.Department of Health Outcomes and Policy, College of Medicine, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Institute for Child Health Policy, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida.Department of Health Outcomes and Policy, College of Medicine, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Institute for Child Health Policy, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida; Department of Pediatrics, University of Florida, Gainesville, Florida."], "25887647": ["Genetic characterization of Bacillus anthracis in Guizhou Province, Southwest of China.", "Bacillus (B.) anthracis is the pathogen that causes fatal anthrax. Guizhou Province is an old foci of anthrax in the southwest of China. Human anthrax has also been frequently reported in Guizhou in recent year. However, there is limited information on the genetic background of local B. anthracis isolates in Guizhou Province. Strain-specific detection of this bacterium using molecular approaches has enhanced our knowledge of microbial genetics. In the present study, we employed Multiple Locus Variable Number Tandem Repeats (VNTR) Analysis (MLVA) assay to analyze the genetic characteristics of B. anthracis strains isolated in Guizhou Province and their relationships to worldwide distributed isolates.A total of 32 isolates of B. anthracis from soil, human, cattle, dog and water of different anthrax epidemics in Guizhou Province from 2006 to 2011 were confirmed with phage lysis test, penicillin inhibition test and PCR. MLVA-8 discriminated them into 28 unique MLVA types (MT G1 - G28), which were novel MTs compared with the previous reports. Cluster tree based on 32 isolates from Guizhou Province and 76 worldwide distributed isolates (30 MTs) showed they were divided into three clusters, designated A, B and C. All the 32 isolates were distributed in cluster A, which were further grouped into A1, A2, A3 and A4 sub-clusters. 32 isolates from Guizhou Province were closely grouped in each of the sub-clusters, respectively. Minimum Spanning Tree (MST) based on the MLVA data showed that the 28 MLVA profiles of isolates from Guizhou Province and 30 MLVA profiles of worldwide distributed isolates formed three clonal complexes (CCs) and ten singletons.28 novel MTs of B. anthracis from Guizhou were revealed and their relationships to worldwide isolates were showed. The results will provide important information for prevention of anthrax and also enhances our understanding of genetic characteristics of B. anthracis in China.", "Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China. zjumedjun@163.com.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Guiyang Centre for Animal Disease Control and Prevention, Guiyang, China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China.Institute of communicable disease control and prevention, Guizhou Provincial Centre for Disease Control and Prevention, 101 Bageyan Road, Guiyang, 550004, Guizhou, People's Republic of China."], "25935109": ["Phase II pilot study of single-agent etirinotecan pegol (NKTR-102) in bevacizumab-resistant high grade glioma.", "Patients with recurrence of high-grade glioma (HGG) after bevacizumab (BEV) have an extremely poor prognosis. Etirinotecan pegol (EP) is the first long-acting topoisomerase-I inhibitor designed to concentrate in and provide continuous tumor exposure throughout the entire chemotherapy cycle. Here we report results of a Phase 2, single arm, open-label trial evaluating EP in HGG patients who progressed after BEV. Patients age >18 with histologically proven anaplastic astrocytoma or glioblastoma (GB) who previously received standard chemo-radiation and recurred after BEV were eligible. A predicted life expectancy >6 weeks and KPS \u2265 50 were required. The primary endpoint was PFS at 6-weeks. Secondary endpoint was overall survival from first EP infusion. Response was assessed by RANO criteria. Single agent EP was administered IV every 3 weeks at 145 mg/m2. Patients did not receive BEV while on EP. 20 patients (90 % GB) were enrolled with a median age of 50 and median KPS of 70. Three patients with GB (16.7 % of GB) had partial MRI responses. 6-week PFS was 55 %. Median and 6-month PFS were 2.2 months (95 % CI 1.4-3.4 months) and 11.2 % (95 % CI 1.9-28.9 %) respectively. Median overall survival from first EP infusion was 4.5 months (95 % CI 2.4-5.9). Only one patient had grade 3 toxicity (diarrhea with dehydration) attributable to EP. Hematologic toxicity was mild. Three patients had confirmed partial responses according to RANO criteria. These clinical data combined with a favorable safety profile warrant further clinical investigation of this agent in HGG.", "Division of Neuro-Oncology, Department of Neurology, Stanford University, 875 Blake Wilbur Drive CC2221, Stanford, CA, 94305, USA, snagpal@stanford.edu."], "26407720": ["Evaluation of smoke-free policies in seven cities in China, 2007-2012.", "China is the world's largest consumer of tobacco, with hundreds of millions of people exposed daily to secondhand smoke (SHS). Comprehensive smoke-free policies are the only effective way to protect the population from the harms of SHS. China does not have a comprehensive national smoke-free law but some local-level regulations have been implemented.To evaluate local level smoke-free regulations across 7 cities in China by measuring the prevalence of smoking in public places (workplaces, restaurants and bars), and support for smoke-free policies over time.Data were from Waves 2 to 4 of the International Tobacco Control (ITC) China Survey (2007-2012), a face-to-face cohort survey of approximately 800 smokers in each of 7 cities in mainland China. Multivariate logistic regression models estimated with generalised estimating equations were used to test the changes in variables over time.As of 2012, over three-quarters of respondents were exposed to smoking in bars; more than two-thirds were exposed to smoking in restaurants and more than half were exposed to smoking in indoor workplaces. Small decreases in the prevalence of smoking were found overall from Waves 2 to 4 for indoor workplaces, restaurants and bars, although the decline was minimal for bars. Support for complete smoking bans increased over time for each venue, although it was lowest for bars.Existing partial smoking bans across China have had minimal impact on reducing smoking in public places. A strongly enforced, comprehensive national smoke-free law is urgently needed in order to achieve greater public health gains.", "Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada Ontario Institute for Cancer Research, Toronto, Ontario, Canada School of Public Health and Health Systems, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Tobacco Control Office, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China."], "26684199": ["Multi-trophic interactions driving the transmission cycle of Borrelia afzelii between Ixodes ricinus and rodents: a review.", "The tick Ixodes ricinus is the main vector of the spirochaete Borrelia burgdorferi sensu lato, the causal agent of Lyme borreliosis, in the western Palearctic. Rodents are the reservoir host of B. afzelii, which can be transmitted to I. ricinus larvae during a blood meal. The infected engorged larvae moult into infected nymphs, which can transmit the spirochaetes to rodents and humans. Interestingly, even though only about 1% of the larvae develop into a borreliae-infected nymph, the enzootic borreliae lifecycle can persist. The development from larva to infected nymph is a key aspect in this lifecycle, influencing the density of infected nymphs and thereby Lyme borreliosis risk. The density of infected nymphs varies temporally and geographically and is influenced by multi-trophic (tick-host-borreliae) interactions. For example, blood feeding success of ticks and spirochaete transmission success differ between rodent species and host-finding success appears to be affected by a B. afzelii infection in both the rodent and the tick. In this paper, we review the major interactions between I. ricinus, rodents and B. afzelii that influence this development, with the aim to elucidate the critical factors that determine the epidemiological risk of Lyme borreliosis. The effects of the tick, rodent and B. afzelii on larval host finding, larval blood feeding, spirochaete transmission from rodent to larva and development from larva to nymph are discussed. Nymphal host finding, nymphal blood feeding and spirochaete transmission from nymph to rodent are the final steps to complete the enzootic B. afzelii lifecycle and are included in the review. It is concluded that rodent density, rodent infection prevalence, and tick burden are the major factors affecting the development from larva to infected nymph and that these interact with each other. We suggest that the B. afzelii lifecycle is dependent on the aggregation of ticks among rodents, which is manipulated by the pathogen itself. Better understanding of the processes involved in the development and aggregation of ticks results in more precise estimates of the density of infected nymphs, and hence predictions of Lyme borreliosis risk.", "Laboratory of Entomology, Wageningen University and Research Centre, Wageningen, The Netherlands. gilian.vanduijvendijk@wur.nl.Laboratory for Zoonosis and Environmental Microbiology, National Institute for Public Health and Environment (RIVM), Bilthoven, The Netherlands. hein.sprong@rivm.nl.Laboratory of Entomology, Wageningen University and Research Centre, Wageningen, The Netherlands. willem.takken@wur.nl."], "26730591": ["Piscine Orthoreovirus from Western North America Is Transmissible to Atlantic Salmon and Sockeye Salmon but Fails to Cause Heart and Skeletal Muscle Inflammation.", "Heart and skeletal muscle inflammation (HSMI) is a significant and often fatal disease of cultured Atlantic salmon in Norway. The consistent presence of Piscine orthoreovirus (PRV) in HSMI diseased fish along with the correlation of viral load and antigen with development of lesions has supported the supposition that PRV is the etiologic agent of this condition; yet the absence of an in vitro culture system to demonstrate disease causation and the widespread prevalence of this virus in the absence of disease continues to obfuscate the etiological role of PRV with regard to HSMI. In this study, we explore the infectivity and disease causing potential of PRV from western North America-a region now considered endemic for PRV but without manifestation of HSMI-in challenge experiments modeled upon previous reports associating PRV with HSMI. We identified that western North American PRV is highly infective by intraperitoneal injection in Atlantic salmon as well as through cohabitation of both Atlantic and Sockeye salmon. High prevalence of viral RNA in peripheral blood of infected fish persisted for as long as 59 weeks post-challenge. Nevertheless, no microscopic lesions, disease, or mortality could be attributed to the presence of PRV, and only a minor transcriptional induction of the antiviral Mx gene occurred in blood and kidney samples during log-linear replication of viral RNA. Comparative analysis of the S1 segment of PRV identified high similarity between this North American sequence and previous sequences associated with HSMI, suggesting that factors such as viral co-infection, alternate PRV strains, host condition, or specific environmental circumstances may be required to cause this disease. ", "Pacific Biological Station, Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Nanaimo, British Columbia, Canada.Pacific Biological Station, Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Nanaimo, British Columbia, Canada.Pacific Biological Station, Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Nanaimo, British Columbia, Canada.Pacific Biological Station, Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Nanaimo, British Columbia, Canada.Animal Health Centre, Ministry of Agriculture, Abbotsford, British Columbia, Canada.Animal Health Centre, Ministry of Agriculture, Abbotsford, British Columbia, Canada.Marine Harvest Canada, Campbell River, British Columbia, Canada.Pacific Biological Station, Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Nanaimo, British Columbia, Canada."], "27091337": ["Endovascular treatment versus medical care alone for ischaemic stroke: systematic review and meta-analysis.", "To evaluate the efficacy and safety of endovascular treatment, particularly adjunctive intra-arterial mechanical thrombectomy, in patients with ischaemic stroke.Systematic review and meta-analysis.Medline, Embase, Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials, Web of Science, SciELO, LILACS, and clinical trial registries from inception to December 2015. Reference lists were crosschecked.Randomised controlled trials in adults aged 18 or more with ischaemic stroke comparing endovascular treatment, including thrombectomy, with medical care alone, including intravenous recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (rt-PA). Trial endpoints were functional outcome (modified Rankin scale scores of \u22642) and mortality at 90 days after onset of symptoms. No language or time restrictions applied.10 randomised controlled trials (n=2925) were included. In pooled analysis endovascular treatment, including thrombectomy, was associated with a higher proportion of patients experiencing good (modified Rankin scale scores \u22642) and excellent (scores \u22641) outcomes 90 days after stroke, without differences in mortality or rates for symptomatic intracranial haemorrhage, compared with patients randomised to medical care alone, including intravenous rt-PA. Heterogeneity was high among studies. The more recent studies (seven randomised controlled trials, published or presented in 2015) proved better suited to evaluate the effect of adjunctive intra-arterial mechanical thrombectomy on its index disease owing to more accurate patient selection, intravenous rt-PA being administered at a higher rate and earlier, and the use of more efficient thrombectomy devices. In most of these studies, more than 86% of the patients were treated with stent retrievers, and rates of recanalisation were higher (>58%) than previously reported. Subgroup analysis of these seven studies yielded a risk ratio of 1.56 (95% confidence interval 1.38 to 1.75) for good functional outcomes and 0.86 (0.69 to 1.06) for mortality, without heterogeneity among the results of the studies. All trials were open label. Risk of bias was moderate across studies. The full results of two trials are yet to be published.Moderate to high quality evidence suggests that compared with medical care alone in a selected group of patients endovascular thrombectomy as add-on to intravenous thrombolysis performed within six to eight hours after large vessel ischaemic stroke in the anterior circulation provides beneficial functional outcomes, without increased detrimental effects.PROSPERO CRD42015019340.", "Laboratory of Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics, Faculty of Medicine, University of Lisbon, Av Prof Egas Moniz 1649-035, Lisbon, Portugal Clinical Pharmacology Unit, Instituto de Medicina Molecular, Lisbon, Portugal Department of Medicine, Hospital de Santa Maria, Centro Hospitalar Lisboa Norte, Portugal filipebrodrigues@gmail.com.Department of Medicine, Hospital de Santa Maria, Centro Hospitalar Lisboa Norte, Portugal.Laboratory of Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics, Faculty of Medicine, University of Lisbon, Av Prof Egas Moniz 1649-035, Lisbon, Portugal Clinical Pharmacology Unit, Instituto de Medicina Molecular, Lisbon, Portugal.Department of Neurosciences, Neurology, Hospital de Santa Maria, Centro Hospitalar Lisboa Norte, Portugal.Laboratory of Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics, Faculty of Medicine, University of Lisbon, Av Prof Egas Moniz 1649-035, Lisbon, Portugal Clinical Pharmacology Unit, Instituto de Medicina Molecular, Lisbon, Portugal Department of Neurosciences, Neurology, Hospital de Santa Maria, Centro Hospitalar Lisboa Norte, Portugal.Laboratory of Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics, Faculty of Medicine, University of Lisbon, Av Prof Egas Moniz 1649-035, Lisbon, Portugal Clinical Pharmacology Unit, Instituto de Medicina Molecular, Lisbon, Portugal Center for Evidence-Based Medicine, Faculty of Medicine, University of Lisbon, Portugal Portuguese Collaborating Center of the IberoAmerican Cochrane Network, Faculty of Medicine, University of Lisbon, Portugal."], "27110809": ["Constraints on the Genetic and Antigenic Variability of Measles Virus.", "Antigenic drift and genetic variation are significantly constrained in measles virus (MeV). Genetic stability of MeV is exceptionally high, both in the lab and in the field, and few regions of the genome allow for rapid genetic change. The regions of the genome that are more tolerant of mutations (i.e., the untranslated regions and certain domains within the N, C, V, P, and M proteins) indicate genetic plasticity or structural flexibility in the encoded proteins. Our analysis reveals that strong constraints in the envelope proteins (F and H) allow for a single serotype despite known antigenic differences among its 24 genotypes. This review describes some of the many variables that limit the evolutionary rate of MeV. The high genomic stability of MeV appears to be a shared property of the Paramyxovirinae, suggesting a common mechanism that biologically restricts the rate of mutation. ", "Icahn School of Medicine at Mount Sinai, New York, NY 10029, USA. shannon.beaty@icahn.mssm.edu.Icahn School of Medicine at Mount Sinai, New York, NY 10029, USA. benhur.lee@mssm.edu."], "27296722": ["First description of clinical presentation of piscine orthoreovirus (PRV) infections in salmonid aquaculture in Chile and identification of a second genotype (Genotype II) of PRV.", "Heart and skeletal muscle inflammation (HSMI) is an emerging disease of marine-farmed Atlantic salmon Salmo salar, first recognized in 1999 in Norway, and recently associated with piscine orthoreovirus (PRV) infection. To date, HSMI lesions with presence of PRV have only been described in marine-farmed Atlantic salmon in Norway. A new HSMI-like disease in rainbow trout Oncorhynchus mykiss associated with a PRV-related virus has also been reported in Norway.Sampling of Atlantic salmon and coho salmon was done during potential disease outbreaks, targeting lethargic/moribund fish. Fish were necropsied and tissues were taken for histopathologic analysis and testing for PRV by RT-qPCR assay for segment L1 and conventional RT-PCR for PRV segment S1. The PCR products were sequenced and their relationship to PRV strains in GenBank was determined using phylogenetic analysis and nucleotide and amino acid homology comparisons.The Atlantic salmon manifested the classical presentation of HSMI with high PRV virus loads (low Ct values) as described in Norway. The coho salmon with low Ct values had myocarditis but only in the spongy layer, the myositis of red muscle in general was mild, and the hepatic necrosis was severe. Upon phylogenetic analysis of PRV segment S1 sequences, all the Chilean PRV strains from Atlantic salmon grouped as sub-genotype Ib, whereas the Chilean PRV strains from coho salmon were more diversified, grouping in both sub-genotypes Ia and Ib and others forming a distinct new phylogenetic cluster, designated Genotype II that included the Norwegian PRV-related virus.To our knowledge the present work constitutes the first published report of HSMI lesions with presence of PRV in farmed Atlantic salmon outside of Europe, and the first report of HSMI-like lesions with presence of PRV in coho salmon in Chile. The Chilean PRV strains from coho salmon are more genetically diversified than those from Atlantic salmon, and some form a distinct new phylogenetic cluster, designated Genotype II.", "Centro de Investigaciones Biol\u00f3gicas Aplicadas (CIBA), Diego de Almagro Norte 1013, No. 8, Puerto Montt, Chile.Facultad de Ciencias, Universidad San Sebasti\u00e1n, Lago Panguipulli 1390, Puerto Montt, Chile.ETECMA, Diego de Almagro Norte 1013, No. 10, Puerto Montt, Chile.Doctorado en Acuicultura, Programa Cooperativo Universidad de Chile, Universidad Cat\u00f3lica del Norte, Antofagasta, Chile.Doctorado en Acuicultura, Programa Cooperativo Universidad de Chile, Pontificia Universidad Cat\u00f3lica de Valpara\u00edso, Valpara\u00edso, Chile.Department of Pathology and Microbiology, Atlantic Veterinary College, University of Prince Edward Island, 550 University Ave, Charlottetown, PEI, C1A 4P3, Canada.School of Mathematical and Computational Sciences, University of Prince Edward Island, 550 University Ave, Charlottetown, PEI, C1A 4P3, Canada.Centro de Investigaciones Biol\u00f3gicas Aplicadas (CIBA), Diego de Almagro Norte 1013, No. 8, Puerto Montt, Chile.ETECMA, Diego de Almagro Norte 1013, No. 10, Puerto Montt, Chile.Centro de Investigaciones Biol\u00f3gicas Aplicadas (CIBA), Diego de Almagro Norte 1013, No. 8, Puerto Montt, Chile., Present Address: Aquagesti\u00f3n S.A. Panamericana Sur 428, Puerto Montt, Chile.Friosur, Aysen, Chile.Department of Pathology and Microbiology, Atlantic Veterinary College, University of Prince Edward Island, 550 University Ave, Charlottetown, PEI, C1A 4P3, Canada. kibenge@upei.ca."], "27474020": ["Countrywide serological evaluation of canine prevalence for Anaplasma spp., Borrelia burgdorferi (sensu lato), Dirofilaria immitis and Ehrlichia canis in Mexico.", "Canine vector-borne diseases (CVBD) have become a major concern for canine and human public health. The aim of the study described here is to add epidemiological data regarding four pathogens responsible for CVBD, namely anaplasmosis, borreliosis, dirofilariosis and ehrlichiosis in a national survey conducted in Mexico.Seventy-four veterinary centres located in 21 federal Mexican states were asked to test dogs with clinical signs suspect for CVBD and healthy dogs, for detection of Dirofilaria immitis antigen and antibodies against Anaplasma spp., Borrelia burgdorferi (sensu lato) and Ehrlichia canis using the SNAP\u00ae 4DX\u00ae from IDEXX\u00ae Laboratories.A total of 1706 dogs were tested, including 943 apparently healthy and 722 CVBD-suspect dogs. Infected dogs were 36.7\u00a0%. The highest percentages of infection with E. canis (51.0\u00a0%) and Anaplasma spp. (16.4\u00a0%) were obtained in the northwestern region, while D. immitis was most frequently found in the northeastern region of the country (8.9\u00a0%). Four dogs from the northwestern, northeastern, eastern and southeastern regions, respectively, were positive for B. burgdorferi (sensu lato). Northcentral regions showed lowest overall prevalence of infection (2.4\u00a0%). Co-infections were detected in 8.8\u00a0% of the dogs tested. Statistically significant lower positivity was found among dogs aged less than one year (23.2\u00a0%) and small-sized dogs (27.6\u00a0%), while higher prevalence of infection was found in dogs living outdoors (42.0\u00a0%), dogs with detectable tick infestation (43.3\u00a0%) and dogs that received treatment for tick-transmitted infections (58.8\u00a0%). Seropositivity was a risk factor for the presence of clinical signs as follows: Anaplasma spp. (OR\u2009=\u20092.63; 95\u00a0% CI: 1.88-3.67; P\u2009<\u20090.0001), D. immitis (OR\u2009=\u20092.52; 95\u00a0% CI: 1.61-3.95; P\u2009<\u20090.0001), E. canis (OR\u2009=\u20093.58; 95\u00a0% CI: 2.88-4.45; P\u2009<\u20090.0001), mixed infections (OR\u2009=\u20094.08; 95\u00a0% CI: 2.79-5.96; P\u2009<\u20090.0001), one or more agents (OR\u2009=\u20093.58; 95\u00a0% CI: 2.91-4.42; P\u2009<\u20090.0001).Canine serological evidence supports that dogs from Mexico are at risk of acquiring Anaplasma spp., D. immitis and/or E. canis, while B. burgdorferi (sensu lato) transmission is minimal in the country. Practitioners play a fundamental role in the detection and control of these diseases to protect dogs and humans.", "Hospital Cl\u00ednic Veterinari, Universitat Aut\u00f2noma de Barcelona, Carrer de l'Hospital, 08193 Cerdanyola del Vall\u00e8s, Barcelona, Spain. rebeca.movilla@uab.cat.Facultad de Medicina Veterinaria y Zootecnia, Facultad de Estudios Superiores Cuatitl\u00e1n UNAM, Mexico Ciudad Universitaria, 04510, Mexico City D.F., Mexico.Bayer Animal Health GmbH, 40789 Monheim and Marketing Companion Animal Products (CAP), InternationalBuilding 6210, 2.56, 51368, Leverkusen, Germany.Hospital Cl\u00ednic Veterinari, Universitat Aut\u00f2noma de Barcelona, Carrer de l'Hospital, 08193 Cerdanyola del Vall\u00e8s, Barcelona, Spain."], "27677796": ["A Bacillus anthracis Genome Sequence from the Sverdlovsk 1979 Autopsy Specimens.", "Anthrax is a zoonotic disease that occurs naturally in wild and domestic animals but has been used by both state-sponsored programs and terrorists as a biological weapon. A Soviet industrial production facility in Sverdlovsk, USSR, proved deficient in 1979 when a plume of spores was accidentally released and resulted in one of the largest known human anthrax outbreaks. In order to understand this outbreak and others, we generated a Bacillus anthracis population genetic database based upon whole-genome analysis to identify all single-nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) across a reference genome. Phylogenetic analysis has defined three major clades (A, B, and C), B and C being relatively rare compared to A. The A clade has numerous subclades, including a major polytomy named the trans-Eurasian (TEA) group. The TEA radiation is a dominant evolutionary feature of B.\u00a0anthracis, with many contemporary populations having resulted from a large spatial dispersal of spores from a single source. Two autopsy specimens from the Sverdlovsk outbreak were deep sequenced to produce draft B.\u00a0anthracis genomes. This allowed the phylogenetic placement of the Sverdlovsk strain into a clade with two Asian live vaccine strains, including the Russian Tsiankovskii strain. The genome was examined for evidence of drug resistance manipulation or other genetic engineering, but none was found. The Soviet Sverdlovsk strain genome is consistent with a wild-type strain from Russia that had no evidence of genetic manipulation during its industrial production. This work provides insights into the world's largest biological weapons program and provides an extensive B.\u00a0anthracis phylogenetic reference.The 1979 Russian anthrax outbreak resulted from an industrial accident at the Soviet anthrax spore production facility in the city of Sverdlovsk. Deep genomic sequencing of two autopsy specimens generated a draft genome and phylogenetic placement of the Soviet Sverdlovsk anthrax strain. While it is known that Soviet scientists had genetically manipulated Bacillus anthracis with the potential to evade vaccine prophylaxis and antibiotic therapeutics, there was no genomic evidence of this from the Sverdlovsk production strain genome. The whole-genome SNP genotype of the Sverdlovsk strain was used to precisely identify it and its close relatives in the context of an extensive global B.\u00a0anthracis strain collection. This genomic identity can now be used for forensic tracking of this weapons material on a global scale and for future anthrax investigations.", "Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Division of Pathogen Genomics, The Translational Genomics Research Institute, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Division of Pathogen Genomics, The Translational Genomics Research Institute, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Division of Pathogen Genomics, The Translational Genomics Research Institute, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA School of Informatics, Computing and Cyber Systems, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA School of Informatics, Computing and Cyber Systems, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Laboratorio Azul, Azul, Buenos Aires. Argentina.Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale of Puglia and Basilicata, Foggia, Italy.Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Atlanta, Georgia, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA.Center for Microbial Genetics and Genomics, Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA Division of Pathogen Genomics, The Translational Genomics Research Institute, Flagstaff, Arizona, USA PaulKeim@nau.edu."], "27986081": ["Comparison of the lifetime host-to-tick transmission between two strains of the Lyme disease pathogen Borrelia afzelii.", "Transmission from the vertebrate host to the arthropod vector is a critical step in the life-cycle of any vector-borne pathogen. How the probability of host-to-vector transmission changes over the duration of the infection is an important predictor of pathogen fitness. The Lyme disease pathogen Borrelia afzelii is transmitted by Ixodes ricinus ticks and establishes a chronic infection inside rodent reservoir hosts. The present study compares the temporal pattern of host-to-tick transmission between two strains of B. afzelii.Laboratory mice were experimentally infected via tick bite with one of two strains of B. afzelii: A3 and A10. Mice were repeatedly infested with pathogen-free larval Ixodes ricinus ticks over a period of 4 months. Engorged larval ticks moulted into nymphal ticks that were tested for infection with B. afzelii using qPCR. The proportion of infected nymphs was used to characterize the pattern of host-to-tick transmission over time.Both strains of B. afzelii followed a similar pattern of host-to-tick transmission. Transmission decreased from the acute to the chronic phase of the infection by 16.1 and 29.3% for strains A3 and A10, respectively. Comparison between strains found no evidence of a trade-off in transmission between the acute and chronic phase of infection. Strain A10 had higher lifetime fitness and established a consistently higher spirochete load in nymphal ticks than strain A3.Quantifying the relationship between host-to-vector transmission and the age of infection in the host is critical for estimating the lifetime fitness of vector-borne pathogens.", "Laboratory of Ecology and Evolution of Parasites, Institute of Biology, University of Neuch\u00e2tel, Neuch\u00e2tel, Switzerland.National Reference Centre for Borrelia, Munich, Oberschleissheim, Germany.Bavarian Health and Food Safety Authority, Munich, Oberschleissheim, Germany.National Reference Centre for Borrelia, Munich, Oberschleissheim, Germany.Bavarian Health and Food Safety Authority, Munich, Oberschleissheim, Germany.Laboratory of Ecology and Evolution of Parasites, Institute of Biology, University of Neuch\u00e2tel, Neuch\u00e2tel, Switzerland. maarten.voordouw@unine.ch."], "28068343": ["The Fleas (Siphonaptera) in Iran: Diversity, Host Range, and Medical Importance.", "Flea-borne diseases have a wide distribution in the world. Studies on the identity, abundance, distribution and seasonality of the potential vectors of pathogenic agents (e.g. Yersinia pestis, Francisella tularensis, and Rickettsia felis) are necessary tools for controlling and preventing such diseases outbreaks. The improvements of diagnostic tools are partly responsible for an easier detection of otherwise unnoticed agents in the ectoparasitic fauna and as such a good taxonomical knowledge of the potential vectors is crucial. The aims of this study were to make an exhaustive inventory of the literature on the fleas (Siphonaptera) and range of associated hosts in Iran, present their known distribution, and discuss their medical importance.The data were obtained by an extensive literature review related to medically significant fleas in Iran published before 31st August 2016. The flea-host specificity was then determined using a family and subfamily-oriented criteria to further realize and quantify the shared and exclusive vertebrate hosts of fleas among Iran fleas. The locations sampled and reported in the literature were primarily from human habitation, livestock farms, poultry, and rodents' burrows of the 31 provinces of the country. The flea fauna were dominated by seven families, namely the Ceratophyllidae, Leptopsyllidae, Pulicidae, Ctenophthalmidae, Coptopsyllidae, Ischnopsyllidae and Vermipsyllidae. The hosts associated with Iran fleas ranged from the small and large mammals to the birds. Pulicidae were associated with 73% (56/77) of identified host species. Flea-host association analysis indicates that rodents are the common hosts of 5 flea families but some sampling bias results in the reduced number of bird host sampled. Analyses of flea-host relationships at the subfamily level showed that most vertebrates hosted fleas belgonging to 3 subfamilies namely Xenopsyllinae (n = 43), Ctenophthalminae (n = 20) and Amphipsyllinae (n = 17). Meriones persicus was infested by 11 flea subfamilies in the arid, rocky, mountainous regions and Xenopsyllinae were hosted by at least 43 mammal species. These findings place the Persian jird (M. persicus) and the Xenopsyllinae as the major vertebrate and vector hosts of flea-borne diseases in Iran including Yersinia pestis, the etiological agent of plague. We found records of at least seven vector-borne pathogenic agents that can potentially be transmitted by the 117 flea species (or subspecies) of Iran.Herein, we performed a thorough inventary of the flea species and their associated hosts, their medical importance and geographic distribution throughout Iran. This exercise allowed assessing the diversity of flea species with the potential flea-borne agents transmission risk in the country by arranging published data on flea-host associations. This information is a first step for issuing public health policies and rodent-flea control campaigns in Iran as well as those interested in the ecology/epidemiology of flea-borne disease.", "Malaria and Vector Research Group, Biotechnology Research Center, Pasteur Institute of Iran, Tehran, Iran.Research Centre for Emerging and Reemerging infectious diseases, Pasteur Institute of Iran, Akanlu, Kabudar Ahang, Hamadan, Iran.Department of Epidemiology and Biostatistics, Pasteur institute of Iran, Tehran, Iran.University of Rennes, France Faculty of Medicine, and Western Insitute of Parasitology, Rennes, France.Evolutionary Biology group, University of Antwerp, Antwerp, Belgium.School of Biological Sciences, University of Liverpool, Liverpool, United Kingdom.CIFOR, Jalan Cifor, Situ Gede, Sindang Barang, Bogor Bar., Jawa Barat, Indonesia.Research Centre for Emerging and Reemerging infectious diseases, Pasteur Institute of Iran, Akanlu, Kabudar Ahang, Hamadan, Iran.Department of Epidemiology and Biostatistics, Pasteur institute of Iran, Tehran, Iran."], "28526093": ["Canine infection with Borrelia burgdorferi, Dirofilaria immitis, Anaplasma spp. and Ehrlichia spp. in Canada, 2013-2014.", "Canine test results generated by veterinarians throughout Canada from 2013-2014 were evaluated to assess the geographical distribution of canine infection with Borrelia burgdorferi, Dirofilaria immitis, Ehrlichia spp., and Anaplasma spp.The percent positive test results of 115,636 SNAP\u00ae 4Dx\u00ae Plus tests from dogs tested were collated by province and municipality to determine the distribution of these vector-borne infections in Canada.A total of 2,844/115,636 (2.5%) dogs tested positive for antibody to B. burgdorferi. In contrast, positive test results for D. immitis antigen and antibodies to Ehrlichia spp. and Anaplasma spp. were low, with less than 0.5% of dogs testing positive for any one of these three agents nationwide. Provincial seroprevalence for antibodies to B. burgdorferi ranged from 0.5% (Saskatchewan)-15.7% (Nova Scotia); the areas of highest percent positive test results were in proximity to regions in the USA considered endemic for Lyme borreliosis, including Nova Scotia (15.7%) and Eastern Ontario (5.1%). These high endemic foci, which had significantly higher percent positive test results than the rest of the nation (P\u2009<\u20090.0001), were surrounded by areas of moderate to low seroprevalence in New Brunswick (3.7%), Quebec (2.8%), and the rest of Ontario (0.9%), as well as northward and westward through Manitoba (2.4%) and Saskatchewan (0.5%). Insufficient results were available from the westernmost provinces, including Alberta and British Columbia, to allow analysis.Increased surveillance of these vector-borne disease agents, especially B. burgdorferi, is important as climate, vector range, and habitat continues to change throughout Canada. Using dogs as sentinels for these pathogens can aid in recognition of the public and veterinary health threat that each pose.", "Department of Veterinary Pathobiology, Center for Veterinary Health Sciences, Oklahoma State University, Stillwater, OK, USA. brian.h.herrin@okstate.edu.Department of Pathobiology, Ontario Veterinary College, University of Guelph, Guelph, ON, Canada.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc, Westbrook, ME, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc, Westbrook, ME, USA.Department of Veterinary Pathobiology, Center for Veterinary Health Sciences, Oklahoma State University, Stillwater, OK, USA."], "28840825": ["Ongoing large measles outbreak with nosocomial transmission in Milan, northern Italy, March-August 2017.", "A large measles outbreak has been ongoing in Milan and surrounding areas. From 1 March to 30 June 2017, 203 measles cases were laboratory-confirmed (108 sporadic cases and 95 related to 47 clusters). Phylogenetic analysis revealed the co-circulation of two different genotypes, D8 and B3. Both genotypes caused nosocomial clusters in two hospitals. The rapid analysis of epidemiological and phylogenetic data allowed effective surveillance and tracking of transmission pathways.", "Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Coordinated Research Center 'EpiSoMI', University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Health Protection Agency, Metropolitan Area of Milan, Milan, Italy.Health Protection Agency, Metropolitan Area of Milan, Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Health Protection Agency, Metropolitan Area of Milan, Milan, Italy.National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella, Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0, Rome, Italy.DG Salute, UO Governo della prevenzione e tutela sanitaria, Lombardy Region, Milan, Italy.DG Salute, UO Governo della prevenzione e tutela sanitaria, Lombardy Region, Milan, Italy.National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella, Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0, Rome, Italy.National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella, Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0, Rome, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, Milan, Italy.Coordinated Research Center 'EpiSoMI', University of Milan, Milan, Italy."], "28920573": ["Preliminary findings indicate nosocomial transmission and Roma population as most affected group in ongoing measles B3 genotype outbreak in Bulgaria, March to August 2017.", "From March to August 2017, 165 measles cases were reported from three regions in Bulgaria. The age range was 0-55 years and 66% of the cases were under 9 years. The Roma population was disproportionally affected (89% of cases), 41% cases were unvaccinated and in 24 cases there was nosocomial transmission mostly in paediatric departments. A child under 12 months of age died. Control measures have been taken and the investigation is still ongoing.", "National Centre of Infectious and Parasitic Diseases, Sofia, Bulgaria.National Centre of Infectious and Parasitic Diseases, Sofia, Bulgaria.National Centre of Infectious and Parasitic Diseases, Sofia, Bulgaria.National Centre of Infectious and Parasitic Diseases, Sofia, Bulgaria.National Centre of Infectious and Parasitic Diseases, Sofia, Bulgaria.National Centre of Infectious and Parasitic Diseases, Sofia, Bulgaria.Bulgarian Association for Prevention and Infection Control - BulNoso, NGO, Sofia, Bulgaria."], "29141164": ["Lomustine and Bevacizumab in Progressive Glioblastoma.", "Bevacizumab is approved for the treatment of patients with progressive glioblastoma on the basis of uncontrolled data. Data from a phase 2 trial suggested that the addition of bevacizumab to lomustine might improve overall survival as compared with monotherapies. We sought to determine whether the combination would result in longer overall survival than lomustine alone among patients at first progression of glioblastoma.We randomly assigned patients with progression after chemoradiation in a 2:1 ratio to receive lomustine plus bevacizumab (combination group, 288 patients) or lomustine alone (monotherapy group, 149 patients). The methylation status of the promoter of OA total of 437 patients underwent randomization. The median number of 6-week treatment cycles was three in the combination group and one in the monotherapy group. With 329 overall survival events (75.3%), the combination therapy did not provide a survival advantage; the median overall survival was 9.1 months (95% confidence interval [CI], 8.1 to 10.1) in the combination group and 8.6 months (95% CI, 7.6 to 10.4) in the monotherapy group (hazard ratio for death, 0.95; 95% CI, 0.74 to 1.21; P=0.65). Locally assessed progression-free survival was 2.7 months longer in the combination group than in the monotherapy group: 4.2 months versus 1.5 months (hazard ratio for disease progression or death, 0.49; 95% CI, 0.39 to 0.61; P<0.001). Grade 3 to 5 adverse events occurred in 63.6% of the patients in the combination group and 38.1% of the patients in the monotherapy group. The addition of bevacizumab to lomustine affected neither health-related quality of life nor neurocognitive function. The MGMT status was prognostic.Despite somewhat prolonged progression-free survival, treatment with lomustine plus bevacizumab did not confer a survival advantage over treatment with lomustine alone in patients with progressive glioblastoma. (Funded by an unrestricted educational grant from F. Hoffmann-La Roche and by the EORTC Cancer Research Fund; EORTC 26101 ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT01290939 ; Eudra-CT number, 2010-023218-30 .).", "From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.).From the University Medical Center and German Cancer Research Center, Heidelberg, Germany (W.W., M.B., F.S., I.H., A.D., M.P.); the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer, Brussels (T.G., V.G.), and Leuven Cancer Institute-KU Leuven, Leuven (P.M.C.) - both in Belgium; Haaglanden Medical Center, The Hague (M.T.), Erasmus MC Cancer Institute, Rotterdam (W.T., J.C.B., M.J.B.), and VU University Medical Center, Amsterdam (M.K.) - all in the Netherlands; the Medical Oncology Department, Azienda Unit\u00e0 Sanitaria Locale di Bologna-IRCCS Istituto delle Scienze Neurologiche, Bologna, Italy (A.A.B.); Institut Gustave Roussy, Villejuif (J.D.), Assistance Publique-H\u00f4pitaux de Paris, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re-Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, INSERM Unit\u00e9 1127, Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique Unit\u00e9 Mixte de Recherche (UMR) 7225, Sorbonne Universit\u00e9s, University Pierre and Marie Curie 06 UMR S1127, and Institut du Cerveau et de la Moelle \u00c9pini\u00e8re, Paris (A.I.), Institut de Cancerologie de l'Ouest-Centre Rene Gauducheau, Saint-Herblain (M.C.), Institut R\u00e9gional du Cancer Montpellier, Montpellier (M.F.), and Centre Hospitalier R\u00e9gional Universitaire de Lille, Lille (E.L.R., F.D.) - all in France; and the Departments of Oncology and Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Zurich, Switzerland (R.S., M.W.)."], "29212743": ["Successful Reperfusion With Intravenous Thrombolysis Preceding Mechanical Thrombectomy in Large-Vessel Occlusions.", "Although current guidelines advocate pretreatment with intravenous thrombolysis (IVT) in all eligible patients with acute ischemic stroke with large-vessel occlusion before mechanical thrombectomy, there are observational data questioning the efficacy of this approach. One of the main arguments in favor of IVT pretreatment is the potential for tissue-type plasminogen activator-induced successful reperfusion (SR) before the onset of endovascular procedure.We performed a systematic review and meta-analysis of randomized controlled clinical trials and observational cohorts providing rates of SR with IVT in patients with large-vessel occlusion before the initiation of mechanical thrombectomy. We also performed subgroup analyses according to study type (randomized controlled clinical trials versus observational) and according to the inclusion per protocol of patients with tandem (intracranial/extracranial) occlusions.We identified 13 eligible studies (7 randomized controlled clinical trials and 6 observational cohorts), including 1561 patients with acute ischemic stroke (median National Institutes of Health Stroke Scale score, 17) with large-vessel occlusion. SR following IVT and before mechanical thrombectomy was documented in 11% (95% confidence interval, 7%-16%), with no difference among cohorts derived from randomized controlled clinical trials and observational studies. There was significant heterogeneity across included studies both in the overall analysis and among subgroups (IPretreatment with systemic thrombolysis in patients with large-vessel occlusion eligible for mechanical thrombectomy results in SR in 1 of 10 cases, negating the need for additional endovascular reperfusion. Tandem occlusions seem to be the least responsive to IVT pretreatment.", "From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.). tsivgoulisgiorg@yahoo.gr.From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.).From the Second Department of Neurology, Attikon University Hospital, National and Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece (G.T., A.H.K.); Department of Neurology, University of Tennessee Health Science Center, Memphis (G.T., A.W.A., A.V.A.); Department of Neurology, University of Ioannina, Greece (A.H.K.); Department of Neurology (P.D.S.) and Department of Neurogeriatry (P.D.S.), Johannes Wesling Medical Center, Ruhr University Bochum, Minden, Germany; Department of Neurology, Universit\u00e4tsklinikum Essen, Germany (M.K.); Department of Neurology, Henry Ford Hospital, Detroit, MI (P.V.); Department of Interventional Neuroradiology, Metropolitan Hospital, Piraeus, Greece (G.M.); Stroke Unit and Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, University of Perugia, Italy (M.P., V.C.); and J.P. Kistler Stroke Research Center, Massachusetts General Hospital, Boston (E.G.)."], "29770166": ["Free Radical Damage in Ischemia-Reperfusion Injury: An Obstacle in Acute Ischemic Stroke after Revascularization Therapy.", "Acute ischemic stroke is a common cause of morbidity and mortality worldwide. Thrombolysis with recombinant tissue plasminogen activator and endovascular thrombectomy are the main revascularization therapies for acute ischemic stroke. However, ischemia-reperfusion injury after revascularization therapy can result in worsening outcomes. Among all possible pathological mechanisms of ischemia-reperfusion injury, free radical damage (mainly oxidative/nitrosative stress injury) has been found to play a key role in the process. Free radicals lead to protein dysfunction, DNA damage, and lipid peroxidation, resulting in cell death. Additionally, free radical damage has a strong connection with inducing hemorrhagic transformation and cerebral edema, which are the major complications of revascularization therapy, and mainly influencing neurological outcomes due to the disruption of the blood-brain barrier. In order to get a better clinical prognosis, more and more studies focus on the pharmaceutical and nonpharmaceutical neuroprotective therapies against free radical damage. This review discusses the pathological mechanisms of free radicals in ischemia-reperfusion injury and adjunctive neuroprotective therapies combined with revascularization therapy against free radical damage.", "Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Clinical Trail and Research Center for Stroke, Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China.Clinical Trail and Research Center for Stroke, Department of Neurology, The First Hospital of Jilin University, Chang Chun 130021, China."], "29897940": ["Reemergence of human plague in Yunnan, China in 2016.", "The third plague pandemic originated from Yunnan Province, China in the middle of the 19th century. The last human plague epidemic in Yunnan occurred from 1986-2005. On June 6, 2016, a case of human plague was reported in the Xishuangbanna Prefecture, Yunnan. The patient suffered from primary septicemic plague after exposure to a dead house rat (Rattus flavipectus), which has been identified as the main plague reservoir in the local epizootic area. Moreover, a retrospective investigation identified another bubonic plague case in this area. Based on these data, human plague reemerged after a silent period of ten years. In this study, three molecular typing methods, including a clustered regularly interspaced short palindromic repeats (CRISPR) analysis, different region analysis (DFR), and multiple-locus variable number of tandem repeats analysis (MLVA), were used to illustrate the molecular characteristics of Yersinia pestis (Y. pestis) strains isolated in Yunnan. The DFR profiles of the strains isolated in Yunnan in 2016 were the same as the strains that had previously been isolated in this Rattus flavipectus plague focus. The c3 spacer present in the previously isolated strains was absent in the spacer arrays of the Ypc CRISPR loci of the strains isolated in 2016. The MLVA analysis using MLVA (14+12) showed that the strains isolated from the human plague case and host animal plague infection in 2016 in Yunnan displayed different molecular patterns than the strains that had previously been isolated from Yunnan and adjacent provinces.", "Yunnan Institute for Endemic Disease Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.Yunnan Provincial Key Laboratory for Zoonosis Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.Yunnan Institute for Endemic Disease Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.Yunnan Provincial Key Laboratory for Zoonosis Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Zhejiang, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Zhejiang, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Zhejiang, China.Yunnan Institute for Endemic Disease Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.Yunnan Provincial Key Laboratory for Zoonosis Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Zhejiang, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Zhejiang, China.Yunnan Institute for Endemic Disease Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.Yunnan Provincial Key Laboratory for Zoonosis Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease control and Prevention, Changping, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Zhejiang, China.Yunnan Institute for Endemic Disease Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China.Yunnan Provincial Key Laboratory for Zoonosis Control and Prevention, Yunnan, China."], "29954410": ["Prevalence and diversity of Rickettsia species in ectoparasites collected from small rodents in Lithuania.", "Rickettsiae are emerging pathogens causing public health problems in many countries around the world. Rickettsia spp. are found in association with a wide range of arthropods which feed on different species of animals. However, the distribution and natural cycle of Rickettsia species and their association with different arthropod vectors are not fully established. The aim of this study was to investigate the presence and prevalence of Rickettsia spp. in ticks, mites and fleas parasitizing different species of small mammals in Lithuania and to molecularly characterize the Rickettsia spp. obtained from different ectoparasites.A total of 1261 ectoparasites (596 Ixodes ricinus ticks, 550 mites of five species and 115 fleas of eight species) collected from 238 rodents in Lithuania during 2013-2014 were investigated for the presence of Rickettsia pathogens. Infection rates were calculated as the maximum likelihood estimation (MLE) with 95% confidence intervals (CI). The infection rate varied among ectoparasites and was found highest in fleas 43.5%, followed by I. ricinus ticks (MLE = 26.5%; 95% CI: 22.2-31.3%) and then mites (MLE = 9.3%; 95% CI: 7.0-12.2%). Sequence analysis of partial gltA and 17kDa genes revealed the presence of Rickettsia helvetica, R. felis, R. monacensis, Rickettsia sp. and rickettsial endosymbionts. Four Rickettsia spp. were identified in fleas, while three Rickettsia spp. were identified in Laelapidae mites and only one (R. helvetica) in I. ricinus ticks.To our knowledge, this is the first report of the occurrence and molecular characterization of Rickettsia spp. in 11 species of ectoparasites of small rodents in Lithuania. The present data extend the knowledge on the distribution of Rickettsia spp. and their association with different arthropod vectors. Prior to our study, R. felis had never been identified in Lithuania. To our knowledge, this is also the first report of R. felis in L. agilis and H. microti mites and in Ct. agyrtes and H. talpae fleas, as well as the first detection of R. monacensis in Ct. agyrtes fleas.", "Faculty of Natural Sciences, Vytautas Magnus University, Vileikos 8, LT-44404, Kaunas, Lithuania.Faculty of Natural Sciences, Vytautas Magnus University, Vileikos 8, LT-44404, Kaunas, Lithuania.Faculty of Natural Sciences, Vytautas Magnus University, Vileikos 8, LT-44404, Kaunas, Lithuania.Faculty of Natural Sciences, Vytautas Magnus University, Vileikos 8, LT-44404, Kaunas, Lithuania.Laboratory of Mammalian Ecology, Nature Research Centre, Akademijos st. 2, LT-08412, Vilnius, Lithuania.Institute of Parasitology and Institute of Zoology, Slovak Academy of Sciences, Hlinkova 3, 04000, Ko\u0161ice, Slovakia.Faculty of Natural Sciences, Vytautas Magnus University, Vileikos 8, LT-44404, Kaunas, Lithuania. algimantas.paulauskas@vdu.lt."], "30176810": ["Genotyping and phylogenetic placement of Bacillus anthracis isolates from Finland, a country with rare anthrax cases.", "Anthrax, the zoonotic disease caused by the gram-positive bacterium Bacillus anthracis, is nowadays rare in northern parts of Europe including Finland and Scandinavia. Only two minor outbreaks of anthrax in 1988 and in 2004 and one sporadic infection in 2008 have been detected in animals in Finland since the 1970's. Here, we report on two Finnish B. anthracis strains that were isolated from spleen and liver of a diseased calf related to the outbreak in 1988 (strain HKI4363/88) and from a local scrotum and testicle infection of a bull in 2008 (strain BA2968). These infections occurred in two rural Finnish regions, i.e., Ostrobothnia in western Finland and P\u00e4ij\u00e4nne Tavastia in southern Finland, respectively.The isolates were genetically characterized by PCR-based methods such as multilocus variable number of tandem repeat analysis (MLVA) and whole genome-sequence analysis (WGS). Phylogenetic comparison of the two strains HKI4363/88 and BA2968 by chromosomal single nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) analysis grouped these organisms within their relatives of the minor canonical A-branch canSNP-group A.Br.003/004 (A.Br.V770) or canonical B-branch B.Br.001/002, respectively. Strain HKI4363/88 clustered relatively closely with other members of the A.Br.003/004 lineage from Europe, South Africa, and South America. In contrast, strain BA2968 clearly constituted a new sublineage within B.Br.001/002 with its closest relative being HYO01 from South Korea.Our results suggest that Finland harbors both unique (autochthonous) and more widely distributed, common clades of B. anthracis. We suspect that members of the common clades such as strains HKI4363/88 have been introduced only recently by anthropogenic activities involving importation of contaminated animal products. On the other hand, autochthonous strains such as isolate BA2968 probably have an older history of their introduction into Finland as evidenced by a high number of single nucleotide variant sites in their genomes.", "Finnish Food Safety Authority (Evira), Veterinary Bacteriology and Pathology Research Unit, Helsinki, Finland.University of Hohenheim, Stuttgart, Germany.Finnish Food Safety Authority (Evira), Veterinary Bacteriology and Pathology Research Unit, Helsinki, Finland.Finnish Food Safety Authority (Evira), Risk Assessment Research Unit, Helsinki, Finland.Bundeswehr Institute of Microbiology, Munich, Germany.Bundeswehr Institute of Microbiology, Munich, Germany.Bundeswehr Institute of Microbiology, Munich, Germany. gregorgrass@bundeswehr.org."], "30419951": ["Seroprevalence and current infections of canine vector-borne diseases in Nicaragua.", "Vector-borne diseases constitute a major problem for veterinary and public health, especially in tropical regions like Central America. Domestic dogs may be infected with several vector-borne pathogens of zoonotic relevance, which may also severely compromise canine health.To assess the prevalence of canine vector-borne diseases in Nicaragua, 329 dogs from seven cities, which were presented to the veterinarian for various reasons, were included in this study. Dogs were examined clinically and diagnostic blood samples were taken for analysis of packed cell volume (PCV) and presence of microfilariae as well as antigen of Dirofilaria immitis and antibodies to Ehrlichia spp., Anaplasma spp. and Borrelia burgdorferi (sensu lato) by use of a commercially available rapid ELISA. To detect current infections, specific PCRs for the detection of E. canis, A. platys and A. phagocytophilum were carried out on blood samples of the respective seropositive dogs. Microfilaremic blood samples, as well as D. immitis antigen positive samples were further subjected to PCR and subsequent sequencing for filarial species identification.Antibodies against Ehrlichia spp. were present in 62.9% of dogs, while Anaplasma spp. seroprevalence was 28.6%. Antibodies against species of both genera were detected in 24.9% of dogs. Borrelia burgdorferi (s.l.) antibodies were not detected. Dirofilaria immitis antigen was present in six animals (1.8%), two of which also showed D. immitis microfilariae in buffy coat. In addition to D. immitis, Acanthocheilonema reconditum was identified by PCR and sequencing in two of four additional microfilaremic blood samples, which were tested negative for D. immitis antigen. Current E. canis infections as defined by DNA detection were present in 58.5% of Ehrlichia-seropositive dogs, while 5.3% of Anaplasma-seropositive dogs were PCR-positive for A. platys, 2.2% for A. phagocytophilum and 16.0% for both Anaplasma species. Current E. canis infection had a statistically significant negative impact on PCV, whereas no relationship between infection status and clinical signs of disease could be observed.These results indicate that canine vector-borne diseases are widespread in Nicaragua and that dogs may constitute a reservoir for human infection with E. canis, A. phagocytophilum and D. immitis. Thus, the use of repellents or acaricides to protect dogs from vector-borne diseases is strongly recommended.", "Institute for Parasitology, Centre for Infection Medicine, University of Veterinary Medicine Hannover, Buenteweg 17, 30559, Hannover, Germany.Laboratorio de Parasitolog\u00eda, Escuela de Medicina Veterinaria, Universidad Nacional, Campus Benjam\u00edn N\u00fa\u00f1ez, Heredia, Costa Rica.Institute for Parasitology, Centre for Infection Medicine, University of Veterinary Medicine Hannover, Buenteweg 17, 30559, Hannover, Germany.IDEXX Laboratories, Moerikestr. 28/3, 71636, Ludwigsburg, Germany.Institute for Parasitology, Centre for Infection Medicine, University of Veterinary Medicine Hannover, Buenteweg 17, 30559, Hannover, Germany. christina.strube@tiho-hannover.de."], "30654640": ["Bridging Therapy Versus Direct Mechanical Thrombectomy in Patients with Acute Ischemic Stroke due to Middle Cerebral Artery Occlusion: A Clinical- Histological Analysis of Retrieved Thrombi.", "Mechanical thrombectomy (MT) is effective in managing patients with acute ischemic stroke (AIS) caused by large-vessel occlusions and allows for valuable histological analysis of thrombi. However, whether bridging therapy (pretreatment with intravenous thrombolysis before MT) provides additional benefits in patients with middle cerebral artery (MCA) occlusion remains unclear. Therefore, this study aimed to compare the effects of direct MT and bridging therapy, and to elucidate the correlation between thrombus composition and stroke subtypes. Seventy-three patients with acute ischemic stroke who received MT, were eligible for intravenous thrombolysis, and had MCA occlusion were included. We matched 21 direct MT patients with 21 bridging therapy patients using propensity score matching and compared their 3rd-month clinical outcomes. All MCA thrombi (n = 45) were histologically analyzed, and the red blood cell (RBC) and fibrin percentages were quantified. We compared the clot composition according to stroke etiology (large-artery atherosclerosis and cardioembolism) and intravenous thrombolysis application. The baseline characteristics showed no difference between groups except for a higher atrial fibrillation rate and NIHSS score on admission in the direct MT group. We performed a supportive analysis using propensity score matching but could not find any differences in the functional outcome, mortality, and intracerebral hemorrhage. In the histological clot analysis, the cardioembolic clots without intravenous thrombolysis pretreatment had higher RBC (P = 0.042) and lower fibrin (P = 0.042) percentages than the large-artery atherosclerosis thrombi. Similar findings were observed in the thrombi treated with recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (P = 0.012). In conclusion, there was no difference in the functional outcomes between the direct MT and bridging therapy groups. However, randomized trials are needed to elucidate the high ratio of cardioembolism subtype in our group of patients. The histological MCA thrombus composition differed between cardioembolism and large-artery atherosclerosis, and this finding provides valuable information on the underlying pathogenesis and thrombus origin.", "1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.2 Department of Pathology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.3 Department of Neurosurgery, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.4 Department of Intervention, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.3 Department of Neurosurgery, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China.1 Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai, China."], "30659618": ["Piscine orthoreovirus-3 is prevalent in wild seatrout (Salmo trutta L.) in Norway.", "In 2017, a PCR-based survey for Piscine orthoreovirus-3 (PRV-3) was conducted in wild anadromous and non-anadromous salmonids in Norway. In seatrout (anadromous Salmo trutta L.), the virus was present in 16.6% of the fish and in 15 of 21 investigated rivers. Four of 221 (1.8%) Atlantic salmon (Salmo salar L.) from three of 15 rivers were also PCR-positive, with Ct-values indicating low amounts of viral RNA. All anadromous Arctic char (Salvelinus alpinus L.) were PCR-negative. Neither non-anadromous trout (brown trout) nor landlocked salmon were PRV-3 positive. Altogether, these findings suggest that in Norway PRV-3 is more prevalent in the marine environment. In contrast, PRV-3 is present in areas with intensive inland farming in continental Europe. PRV-3 genome sequences from Norwegian seatrout grouped together with sequences from rainbow trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss Walbaum) in Norway and Coho salmon (Oncorhynchus kisutch Walbaum) in Chile. At present, the origin of the virus remains unknown. Nevertheless, the study highlights the value of safeguarding native fish by upholding natural and artificial barriers that hinder introduction and spread, on a local or national scale, of alien fish species and their pathogens. Accordingly, further investigations of freshwater reservoirs and interactions with farmed salmonids are warranted.", "Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Food Safety Authority, Oslo, Norway."], "30691522": ["Prevalence of Borrelia burgdorferi, Anaplasma spp., Ehrlichia spp. and Dirofilaria immitis in Canadian dogs, 2008 to 2015: a repeat cross-sectional study.", "Vector-borne pathogens are emerging concerns in multiple regions of Canada. Determining regional prevalence of canine vector-borne pathogens and documenting change will improve clinician awareness, enable targeted prevention, enhance diagnosis and ideally reduce the risk of disease. Study objectives were to: (i) estimate the prevalence of positive canine vector-borne test results from samples submitted in Canada; (ii) assess change in prevalence over time, from baseline (2008) to 2015; and (iii) estimate the prevalence of pathogen co-infections.This repeat cross-sectional study evaluated 753,468 test results for D. immitis antigen and B. burgdorferi, Ehrlichia canis/ewingii/muris serology, and 753,208 test results for Anaplasma phagocytophilum/platys serology using the SNAP\u00ae 4Dx\u00aeTest and SNAP 4Dx\u00ae Plus Test.Based on all submitted samples from Canada (2008-2015), the period seroprevalence of B. burgdorferi, Ehrlichia spp., Anaplasma spp. and D. immitis antigen were 2.0%, 0.5%, 0.4% and 0.2%, respectively. Over the 7 years (2008 compared to 2015) we observed a significant increase in seroprevalence for B. burgdorferi (144.4%) and Ehrlichia spp. (150%). Co-infections (positive for two or more pathogens on a single 4 pathogen test kit) were estimated at 5.4% (1162/21,612) of total positive tests.The temporal rise and geographical differences in prevalence detected for these pathogens (notably B. burgdorferi) are consistent with anecdotal information on canine illness related to tick-borne pathogen exposure in multiple regions of Canada, particularly canine Lyme disease.", "University of Prince Edward Island, Charlottetown, Prince Edward Island, C1A 4P3, Canada. mevason@upei.ca.University of Guelph, Guelph, Ontario, N1G 2W1, Canada. mevason@upei.ca.University of Prince Edward Island, Charlottetown, Prince Edward Island, C1A 4P3, Canada.The Ohio State University, Columbus, Ohio, 43210, USA.University of Guelph, Guelph, Ontario, N1G 2W1, Canada.University of Guelph, Guelph, Ontario, N1G 2W1, Canada.University of Guelph, Guelph, Ontario, N1G 2W1, Canada.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., 1 IDEXX Drive, Westbrook, Maine, 04092, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., 1 IDEXX Drive, Westbrook, Maine, 04092, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., 1 IDEXX Drive, Westbrook, Maine, 04092, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., 1 IDEXX Drive, Westbrook, Maine, 04092, USA.University of Guelph, Guelph, Ontario, N1G 2W1, Canada."], "30700987": ["Antiviral Responses and Biological Concequences of ", "Salmonid red blood cells are the main target cells for ", "Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Norwegian University of Life Sciences, Oslo, Norway.Division of Aquaculture, Norwegian Institute of Fisheries and Aquaculture (Nofima), Troms\u00f8, Norway.Division of Aquaculture, Norwegian Institute of Fisheries and Aquaculture (Nofima), Troms\u00f8, Norway.Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Norwegian University of Life Sciences, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.The Norwegian College of Fishery Science, UiT The Arctic University of Norway, Troms\u00f8, Norway."], "30869017": ["Genetic characterisation of Measles virus variants identified during a large epidemic in Milan, Italy, March-December 2017.", "In 2017, Italy experienced a large measles epidemic with 5408 cases and four deaths. As Subnational Reference Laboratory of the Measles and Rubella surveillance NETwork (MoRoNET), the EpiSoMI (Epidemiology and Molecular Surveillance of Infections) Laboratory (University of Milan) set up rapid and active surveillance for the complete characterisation of the Measles virus (Mv) responsible for the large measles outbreak in Milan and surrounding areas (Lombardy, Northern Italy). The aims of this study were to describe the genetic profile of circulating viruses and to track the pathway of measles transmission. Molecular analysis was performed by sequencing the highly variable 450 nucleotides region of the N gene (N-450) of Mv genome. Two-hundred and ninety-nine strains of Mv were analysed. The phylogenetic analysis showed five different variants, two not previously described in the studied area, belonging to D8 and B3 genotypes. Three events of continuous transmission of autochthonous variants (D8-Osaka, D8-London and B3-Milan variants) and two events of continuous transmission of imported variants (B3-Dublin and D8-Hulu Langat) tracked five different transmission pathways. These pathways outlined two epidemic peaks: the first in April and the second in July 2017. The correlation between Mv variant and the epidemiological data may enable us to identify the sources of virus importation and recognise long-lasting virus transmission pathways.", "Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health,University of Milan,Milan,Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health,University of Milan,Milan,Italy.Department of Biomedical and Clinical Sciences 'Luigi Sacco',University of Milan,Milan,Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health,University of Milan,Milan,Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health,University of Milan,Milan,Italy.National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella,Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0 (ISS),Rome,Italy.Health Protection Agency, Metropolitan Area of Milan,Milan,Italy.Health Protection Agency, Metropolitan Area of Milan,Milan,Italy.Health Protection Agency, Metropolitan Area of Milan,Milan,Italy.National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella,Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0 (ISS),Rome,Italy.DG Salute, UO Governo della prevenzione e tutela sanitaria,Lombardy Region, Milan,Italy.Department of Biomedical and Clinical Sciences 'Luigi Sacco',University of Milan,Milan,Italy.National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella,Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0 (ISS),Rome,Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health,University of Milan,Milan,Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health,University of Milan,Milan,Italy."], "30917860": ["A review on the occurrence of companion vector-borne diseases in pet animals in Latin America.", "Companion vector-borne diseases (CVBDs) are an important threat for pet life, but may also have an impact on human health, due to their often zoonotic character. The importance and awareness of CVBDs continuously increased during the last years. However, information on their occurrence is often limited in several parts of the world, which are often especially affected. Latin America (LATAM), a region with large biodiversity, is one of these regions, where information on CVBDs for pet owners, veterinarians, medical doctors and health workers is often obsolete, limited or non-existent. In the present review, a comprehensive literature search for CVBDs in companion animals (dogs and cats) was performed for several countries in Central America (Belize, Caribbean Islands, Costa Rica, Cuba, Dominican Republic, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, Mexico, Nicaragua, Panama, Puerto Rico) as well as in South America (Argentina, Bolivia, Brazil, Chile, Colombia, Ecuador, French Guiana, Guyana (British Guyana), Paraguay, Peru, Suriname, Uruguay, Venezuela) regarding the occurrence of the following parasitic and bacterial diseases: babesiosis, heartworm disease, subcutaneous dirofilariosis, hepatozoonosis, leishmaniosis, trypanosomosis, anaplasmosis, bartonellosis, borreliosis, ehrlichiosis, mycoplasmosis and rickettsiosis. An overview on the specific diseases, followed by a short summary on their occurrence per country is given. Additionally, a tabular listing on positive or non-reported occurrence is presented. None of the countries is completely free from CVBDs. The data presented in the review confirm a wide distribution of the CVBDs in focus in LATAM. This wide occurrence and the fact that most of the CVBDs can have a quite severe clinical outcome and their diagnostic as well as therapeutic options in the region are often difficult to access and to afford, demands a strong call for the prevention of pathogen transmission by the use of ectoparasiticidal and anti-feeding products as well as by performing behavioural changes.", "Department of Clinical Sciences and the Intracellular Pathogens Research Laboratory, College of Veterinary Medicine, North Carolina State University, Raleigh, NC, USA. rgmaggi@ncsu.edu.Institute of Parasitology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Leipzig University, Leipzig, Germany."], "31073518": ["Measles Epidemics in Romania: Lessons for Public Health and Future Policy.", "Measles is a highly infectious viral disease that continues to be a challenge for many countries worldwide. Although significant improvements have been observed since the introduction of vaccines, measles remains endemic in Romania. Contributing factors include vaccine hesitancy, difficulties in delivering doses to the population, and even the lack of sufficient vaccine supplies. These problems are further exacerbated by an inadequate implementation of public health measures, ranging from inefficient communication programs to the absence of a legislative framework concerning immunization. Moreover, many of the recent outbreaks were associated with chains of transmission in other countries, thus making the control of measles in Romania relevant at an international level. As many difficulties exist, understanding the key factors that limit the success of public health programs may provide guidance in shaping future strategies. Because similar issues are being faced in various other countries, the management of measles in Romania offers valuable lessons for researchers and policy-makers alike.", "Department of Zoology, University of Oxford, Oxford, United Kingdom.Avian Influenza Virus, Pirbright Institute (BBSRC), Woking, United Kingdom."], "31267976": ["Providers' Perceptions of Parental Human Papillomavirus Vaccine Hesitancy: Cross-Sectional Study.", "Human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine hesitancy among parents contributes to low vaccination coverage in adolescents. To improve health care provider communication and vaccine recommendation practices with hesitant parents, it is important to understand how providers perceive parental HPV vaccine hesitancy.This study aimed to characterize perceived reasons for parental HPV vaccine hesitancy and identify factors associated with perceived parental hesitancy among providers at community-based pediatric clinics.In 2018, providers in 23 community-based pediatric clinics in Tennessee were invited to complete a Web-based baseline survey as part of a larger quality improvement study focused on HPV vaccine uptake. These survey data were used for a cross-sectional, secondary data analysis. Scale scores ranging from 0 to 100 were calculated for provider self-efficacy (confidence in ability to recommend HPV vaccine), provider outcome expectations (expectations that recommendation will influence parents' decisions), and perceived parental HPV vaccine hesitancy. Provider confidence in HPV vaccine safety and effectiveness were categorized as high versus low. Clinic-level exposures examined were clinic size and rural-urban location. Descriptive analyses were used to characterize perceived parental barriers by provider type. Mixed-effects linear regression models were fit taking one exposure variable at a time, whereas controlling for provider type, age, gender, and race to identify provider- and clinic-level factors associated with perceived parental barriers to HPV vaccination.Of the 187 providers located in the 23 clinics, 137 completed the survey. The majority of physician providers were white and female, with a higher percentage of females among nurse practitioners (NPs) and physician assistants (PAs). The most common parental barriers to HPV vaccination perceived by providers were concerns about HPV vaccine safety (88%), child being too young (78%), low risk of HPV infection for child through sexual activity (70%), and mistrust in vaccines (59%). In adjusted mixed models, perceived parental HPV vaccine hesitancy was significantly associated with several provider-level factors: self-efficacy (P=.001), outcome expectations (P<.001), and confidence in HPV vaccine safety (P=.009). No significant associations were observed between perceived parental HPV vaccine hesitancy and clinic-level factors clinic size nor location.Researchers developing provider-focused interventions to reduce parental HPV vaccine hesitancy should consider addressing providers' self-efficacy, outcome expectations, and confidence in HPV vaccine safety to help providers communicate more effectively with HPV vaccine hesitant parents.", "Department of Internal Medicine, Meharry Medical College, Nashville, TN, United States.Department of Biostatistics, Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, TN, United States.Department of Biostatistics, Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, TN, United States.Division of Epidemiology, Department of Medicine, Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, TN, United States.Meharry-Vanderbilt Alliance, Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, TN, United States.Cumberland Pediatric Foundation, Nashville, TN, United States.Division of Epidemiology, Department of Medicine, Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, TN, United States.Division of Epidemiology, Department of Medicine, Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, TN, United States."], "31315564": ["Genotyping and phylogenetic location of one clinical isolate of Bacillus anthracis isolated from a human in Russia.", "Anthrax is a zoonotic disease caused by the Gram-positive bacterium Bacillus anthracis. In Russia, there are more than 35 thousand anthrax stationary unfavourable sites. At the same time, there is very little published information about the isolates of B. anthracis from the territory of Russia. In this study, we report the use of whole genome sequencing (WGS) and bioinformatics analysis to characterize B. anthracis 81/1 strain isolated in Russia in 1969 from a person during an outbreak of the disease in the Stavropol region.We used 232 B. anthracis genomes, which are currently available in the GenBank database, to determine the place of the Russian isolate in the global phylogeny of B. anthracis. The studied strain was characterized by PCR-based genetic methods, such as Multiple-Locus Variable-Number Tandem Repeat Analysis (MLVA), canonical single nucleotide polymorphisms (canSNP), as well as the method of full-genomic analysis of nucleotide polymorphisms (wgSNP). The results indicate that the Russian B. anthracis 81/1 strain belongs to Trans-Eurasion (TEA) group, the most representative in the world.In this study, the full genomic sequence of virulent B. anthracis strain from Russia was characterized for the first time. As a result of complex phylogenetic analysis, the place of this isolate was determined in the global phylogenetic structure of the B. anthracis population, expanding our knowledge of anthrax phylogeography in Russia.", "Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia. pisarenko_sv@mail.ru.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol Research Anti-Plague Institute, 13-15 Sovetskaya Str, Stavropol, 355035, Russia.Stavropol State Agrarian University, Stavropol, 355017, Russian Federation."], "31379707": ["A Risk Classification System With Five-Gene for Survival Prediction of Glioblastoma Patients.", "", "Department of Neurosurgery, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Stomatology, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Neurosurgery, The First Hospital of China Medical University, Shenyang, China.Center for Neuroscience, Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Neurosurgery, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China."], "31385961": ["Modern reirradiation for recurrent gliomas can safely delay tumor progression.", "Despite advances in modern therapy, high-grade gliomas continue to portend a dismal prognosis and nearly all patients will experience relapse. Unfortunately, salvage options remain limited. In this study, we assessed outcomes for patients with recurrent gliomas treated with reirradiation.We retrospectively identified 48 glioma patients treated with reirradiation between 2013 and 2016. All had radiographic or pathologic evidence of recurrence. Prognostic factors were abstracted from the electronic medical record.Initial surgery included biopsy in 15, subtotal resection in 21, and gross total resection in 12. Initial chemotherapy included temozolomide (TMZ) in 31, TMZ+dasatinib in 7, TMZ+vorinostat in 3, and procarbazine, lomustine, and vincristine in 2. The median dose of primary radiotherapy was 60 Gy delivered in 30 fractions. Median overall survival (OS) and progression-free survival (PFS) from initial diagnosis were 3.2 and 1.7 years, respectively. A total of 36 patients failed salvage bevacizumab before reirradiation. Salvage surgery was performed before reirradiation in 21 patients. Median time to reirradiation was 1.7 years. Median follow-up was 13.7 months from reirradiation. Concurrent systemic therapy was given in 33 patients (bevacizumab in 27, TMZ in 8, and lomustine in 2). Median PFS and OS after reirradiation were 3.2 and 6.3 months, respectively. Radionecrosis occurred in 4 patients and no radionecrosis was seen in patients receiving concurrent bevacizumab with reirradiation (0% vs 19%, Reirradiation may result in delayed tumor progression with acceptable toxicity. Prospective trials are needed to determine the impact of reirradiation on tumor progression and quality of life.", "Department of Radiation Oncology, Mayo Clinic, Rochester, MN.Department of Radiation Oncology, Mayo Clinic, Rochester, MN.Department of Radiation Oncology, Mayo Clinic, Rochester, MN.Department of Radiation Oncology, Mayo Clinic, Rochester, MN.Division of Medical Oncology, Mayo Clinic, Rochester, MN.Department of Radiation Oncology, Mayo Clinic, Rochester, MN."], "31463471": ["Educating healthcare providers to increase Human Papillomavirus (HPV) vaccination rates: A Qualitative Systematic Review.", "HPV vaccination rates in the United States lag behind other developed countries. Educational interventions are primarily directed at patients and parents rather than healthcare providers (HCPs), despite evidence that provider recommendation is a key determinant of vaccine uptake. The objectives for this review are to synthesize the available evidence related to the knowledge, attitudes, and beliefs of HCPs surrounding HPV vaccination, to summarize provider-specific educational interventions which have been evaluated, and to review existing provider-specific educational resources from national organizations and whether they align with the gaps identified.A systematic search was performed using PubMed, Web of Science, CINAHL, and ERIC with MeSH terms human papillomavirus, vaccine, education, workshop, training, knowledge, attitude, belief, intention, and healthcare provider. Full text articles were obtained for studies that described the knowledge and attitudes of providers and/or impact of educational interventions. Data extraction was performed by four independent reviewers. Websites of American organizations with an interest in HPV vaccination were manually searched for provider resources.1066 publications were identified, and 98 articles were fully reviewed with 40 ultimately included. Providers' knowledge on HPV was generally low with a correspondingly low vaccine recommendation rate. Provider-specific education (e.g., didactic session and communication training) with complimentary interventions demonstrated increased knowledge and vaccine series initiation and completion. Themes identified in descriptive studies highlighted providers' lack of general HPV and vaccine knowledge, low self-confidence in counselling and addressing parental concerns, and discomfort in discussing sexual issues related to vaccination. Many American organizations have provider-specific resources; however, the effectiveness of these materials has not been established.HPV knowledge among providers remains low. Educational interventions to improve knowledge and communication appear to be effective. A breadth of resources from national organizations are available but their efficacy and level of utilization is largely unknown. Coordinated efforts are needed to evaluate provider-specific educational resources to improve vaccine uptake in the US.", "Division of Gynecologic Oncology, Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Brigham and Women's Hospital, Harvard Medical School, Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, Boston, MA, United States.Department of Global Education, Harvard Medical School, Boston, MA, United States.Division of Gynecologic Oncology, Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Brigham and Women's Hospital, Harvard Medical School, Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, Boston, MA, United States.Division of Gynecologic Oncology, Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Brigham and Women's Hospital, Harvard Medical School, Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, Boston, MA, United States."], "31610803": ["Trends in canine seroprevalence to Borrelia burgdorferi and Anaplasma spp. in the eastern USA, 2010-2017.", "Borrelia burgdorferi and Anaplasma phagocytophilum are tick-borne infections transmitted by Ixodes scapularis in the eastern USA; both agents cause disease in dogs and people. To characterize changes in seroprevalence over time, Cochran Armitage trend tests were used to evaluate percent positive test results for antibodies to B. burgdorferi and Anaplasma spp. in approximately 20 million canine tests from 2010-2017 in 25 states and 905 counties in the eastern USA.A significant decreasing trend in seroprevalence to B. burgdorferi was evident in eight states along the mid-Atlantic coast from Virginia to New Hampshire, and in Wisconsin. In contrast, a continued increasing trend was evident in five northeastern and Midwestern states where Lyme borreliosis is endemic or emerging, as well as in three southern states where endemicity has not yet been widely established. Similarly, seroprevalence to Anaplasma spp. showed a significant, although smaller, decreasing trend in five states along the mid-Atlantic coast from Virginia to Connecticut and Rhode Island, as well as in Minnesota and Wisconsin in the Midwest; despite the fact that those trends were significant they were weak. However, a strong increasing trend was evident in Massachusetts and three states in northern New England as well as in Pennsylvania.As expected, seroprevalence continued to increase in regions where Lyme borreliosis and anaplasmosis are more newly endemic. However, the declining seroprevalence evident in other areas was not anticipated. Although the reasons for the decreasing trends are not clear, our finding may reflect shifting ecologic factors that have resulted in decreased infection risk or the combined positive influence of canine vaccination, tick control, and routine testing of dogs in regions where these infections have long been endemic. Analysis of trends in canine test results for tick-borne infections continues to be a valuable tool to understand relative geographical and temporal risk for these zoonotic agents.", "Department of Veterinary Pathobiology, Center for Veterinary Health Sciences, Oklahoma State University, Stillwater, Oklahoma, USA.Department of Veterinary Pathobiology, Center for Veterinary Health Sciences, Oklahoma State University, Stillwater, Oklahoma, USA. susan.little@okstate.edu.Department of Statistics, College of Arts and Sciences, Oklahoma State University, Stillwater, Oklahoma, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., Westbrook, Maine, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., Westbrook, Maine, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., Westbrook, Maine, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., Westbrook, Maine, USA.IDEXX Laboratories, Inc., Westbrook, Maine, USA."], "31678955": ["Determinants of vaccine hesitancy in Switzerland: study protocol of a mixed-methods national research programme.", "Vaccine hesitancy is a complex public health issue referring to concerns about the safety, efficacy or need for vaccination. Relatively little is known about vaccine hesitancy in Switzerland. This ongoing study (2017-2021) focuses on biomedical and complementary and alternative medicine (CAM) providers and their patients since healthcare professionals play important roles in vaccination decision-making. This national research programme seeks to assess the sociocultural determinants of vaccine hesitancy regarding childhood and human papillomavirus vaccines in Switzerland. We aim to provide a detailed characterisation of vaccine hesitancy, including CAM and biomedical perspectives, patient-provider interactions, and sociocultural factors, to establish the mediating effects of vaccine hesitancy on underimmunisation, and to design an intervention to improve vaccination communication and counselling among physicians, parents and adolescents.Our transdisciplinary team employs a sequential exploratory mixed-methods study design. We have established a network of more than 150 medical providers across Switzerland, including more than 40 CAM practitioners. For the qualitative component, we conduct interviews with parents, youth, and biomedical and CAM providers and observations of vaccination consultations and school vaccination information sessions. For the quantitative component, a sample of 1350 parents of young children and 722 young adults (15-26 years) and their medical providers respond to questionnaires. We measure vaccine hesitancy with the Parent Attitudes about Childhood Vaccines 15-item survey and review vaccination certificates to assess vaccination status. We administer additional questions based on findings from qualitative research, addressing communication with medical providers, vaccine information sources and perceptions of risk control vis-\u00e0-vis vaccine-preventable diseases. The questionnaires capture sociodemographics, political views, religion and spirituality, and moral foundations.The study was approved by the local ethics committee. The results will be published in peer-reviewed journals and disseminated to healthcare professionals, researchers and the public via conferences and public presentations.", "Swiss Tropical and Public Health Institute, Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.Swiss Tropical and Public Health Institute, Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.Swiss Tropical and Public Health Institute, Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.Department of Pediatrics, HFR Fribourg Cantonal Hospital, Fribourg, Switzerland.Swiss Tropical and Public Health Institute, Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine, Kantonsspital Baselland, University of Basel, Bruderholz, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine, Kantonsspital Baselland, University of Basel, Bruderholz, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine, Kantonsspital Baselland, University of Basel, Bruderholz, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine, Kantonsspital Baselland, University of Basel, Bruderholz, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine, Kantonsspital Baselland, University of Basel, Bruderholz, Switzerland.Klinik Arlesheim, Arlesheim, Switzerland.Swiss Tropical and Public Health Institute, Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland.Institute of Sociological Research, University of Geneva, Geneva, Switzerland.University of Basel, Basel, Switzerland philip.tarr@unibas.ch.University Department of Medicine, Kantonsspital Baselland, University of Basel, Bruderholz, Switzerland."], "31772556": ["Subnational smoke-free laws in China.", "Implementing comprehensive smoke-free laws is an important part of tobacco control and has been promoted since China ratified the WHO Framework Convention on Tobacco Control (WHO FCTC) in 2005. This study shows the predictors of adopting subnational smoke-free laws and their alignment with Article 8 of WHO FCTC.The legislations of 125 cities from China's top three city grades were assessed, covering the cities that have smoke-free laws. Logistic regression is applied to evaluate the characteristics of cities that adopted a smoke-free law. We also compare each smoke-free law with the WHO FCTC Article 8 requirements.Provincial capital cities were more likely to adopt smoke-free laws compared with other cities. Smoke-free laws vary from comprehensive to partial bans with major exemptions. Among the 21 cities that have enacted smoke-free laws, 9 cities prohibited smoking in all indoor workplaces, indoor public places (restaurants, bars, health facilities, government buildings and schools) and public transportation. More than half of the smoke-free laws still allow designated indoor smoking rooms. Smoke-free laws that clearly ban e-cigarettes in smoke-free areas have been implemented in only two cities (Nanning and Hangzhou).This study shows that a number of Chinese cities have taken legislative measures to protect people from exposure to tobacco smoke. It identifies signs of progress but also areas for improvement, such as the scope of smoke-free laws, imperfect implementation of such laws, and the potential omission of e-cigarettes from the legislation.", "Department of Social Medicine and Health Education, School of Public Health, Peking University, Beijing, China.Department of Social Medicine and Health Education, School of Public Health, Peking University, Beijing, China.Tobacco Medicine and Tobacco Cessation Center, China-Japan Friendship Hospital, Beijing, China.Department of Social Medicine and Health Education, School of Public Health, Peking University, Beijing, China."], "31803536": ["Identification of prognostic gene signature associated with microenvironment of lung adenocarcinoma.", "Lung cancer has the highest morbidity and mortality worldwide, and lung adenocarcinoma (LADC) is the most common pathological subtype. Accumulating evidence suggests the tumor microenvironment (TME) is correlated with the tumor progress and the patient's outcome. As the major components of TME, the tumor-infiltrated immune cells and stromal cells have attracted more and more attention. In this study, differentially expressed immune and stromal signature genes were used to construct a TME-related prognostic model for predicting the outcomes of LADC patients.The expression profiles of LADC samples with clinical information were obtained from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and Gene Expression Omnibus (GEO). The differentially expressed genes (DEGs) related to the TME of LADC were identified using TCGA dataset by Wilcoxon rank sum test. The prognostic effects of TME-related DEGs were analyzed using univariate Cox regression. Then, the least absolute shrinkage and selection operator (LASSO) regression was performed to reduce the overfit and the number of genes for further analysis. Next, the prognostic model was constructed by step multivariate Cox regression and risk score of each sample was calculated. Then, survival and Receiver Operating Characteristic (ROC) analyses were conducted to validate the model using TCGA and GEO datasets, respectively. The Kyoto Encyclopedia of Genes and Genomes analysis of gene signature was performed using Gene Set Enrichment Analysis (GSEA). Finally, the overall immune status, tumor purity and the expression profiles of HLA genes of high- and low-risk samples was further analyzed to reveal the potential mechanisms of prognostic effects of the model.A total of 93 TME-related DEGs were identified, of which 23 DEGs were up-regulated and 70 DEGs were down-regulated. The univariate cox analysis indicated that 23 DEGs has the prognostic effects, the hazard ratio ranged from 0.65 to 1.25 (", "Department of Biotechnology, College of Life Science & Bioengineering, Beijing University of Technology, Beijing, China.Department of Biotechnology, College of Life Science & Bioengineering, Beijing University of Technology, Beijing, China.Department of Biotechnology, College of Life Science & Bioengineering, Beijing University of Technology, Beijing, China."], "31831539": ["Secondhand smoke exposure and support for smoke-free policies in cities and rural areas of China from 2009 to 2015: a population-based cohort study (the ITC China Survey).", "To examine trends in smoking prevalence in key venues (workplaces, restaurants, bars) and in public support for comprehensive smoke-free laws, with comparisons between cities and rural areas in China.Data are from Waves 3-5 (2009-2015) of the International Tobacco Control (ITC) China Survey, a cohort survey of smokers and non-smokers. Logistic regression analyses employing generalised estimating equations assessed changes in smoking prevalence and support for smoke-free laws over time; specific tests assessed whether partial smoking bans implemented in three cities between Waves 3 and 4 had greater impact.Face-to-face surveys were conducted in seven cities (Beijing, Changsha, Guangzhou, Kunming, Shanghai, Shenyang and Yinchuan) and five rural areas (Changzhi, Huzhou, Tongren, Yichun and Xining).In each survey location at each wave, a representative sample of approximately 800 smokers and 200 non-smokers (aged 18+) were selected using a multistage cluster sampling design.Prevalence of smoking (whether respondents noticed smoking inside restaurants, bars and workplaces); smoking rules inside these venues; and support for complete smoking bans in these venues.Although smoking prevalence decreased and support increased over time, neither trend was greater in cities that implemented partial smoke-free laws. Smoking was higher in rural than urban workplaces (62% vs 44%, p<0.01), but was equally high in all restaurants and bars. There were generally no differences in secondhand smoke (SHS) exposure between smokers and non-smokers except in rural workplaces (74% vs 58%, p<0.05). Support for comprehensive bans was equally high across locations.Partial laws have had no effect on reducing SHS in China. There is an urgent need for comprehensive smoke-free laws to protect the public from exposure to deadly tobacco smoke in both urban and rural areas. The high support among Chinese smokers for such a law demonstrates that public support is not a barrier for action.", "Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada gsansone@uwaterloo.ca.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.School of Public Health and Health Systems, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Ontario Institute for Cancer Research, Toronto, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Department of Statistics and Actuarial Science, University of Waterloo, Waterloo, Ontario, Canada.Tobacco Control Office, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China.Tobacco Control Office, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China."], "31920340": ["Circulating Cell-Free DNA or Circulating Tumor DNA in the Management of Ovarian and Endometrial Cancer.", "Ovarian cancer (OC) is the most lethal cancer of all gynecological malignancies, while endometrial cancer (EC) is the most common one. Current strategies for OC/EC diagnosis consist of the extraction of a solid tissue from the affected area. This sample enables the study of specific biomarkers and the genetic nature of the tumor. However, the tissue extraction is risky and painful for the patient and in some cases is unavailable in inaccessible tumors. Moreover, a tissue biopsy is expensive and requires a highly skilled gynecological surgery to pinpoint accurately which cannot be applied repeatedly. New alternatives that overcome these drawbacks are rising up nowadays, such as liquid biopsy. A liquid biopsy is the analysis of biomarkers in a non-solid biological tissue, mainly blood, which has remarkable advantages over the traditional method. The most studied cancer non-invasive biomarkers are circulating tumor cells (CTCs), circulating tumor DNA (ctDNA), and circulating free DNA (cfDNA). These circulating biomarkers play a key role in the understanding of metastasis and tumorigenesis, which could provide a better insight into the evolution of the tumor dynamics during treatment and disease progression. Liquid biopsy is an emerging non-invasive, safe and effective method with considerable potential for clinical diagnosis and treatment management in patients with OC and EC. Analysis of cfDNA and ctDNA will provide a better characterization of biomarkers and give rise to a wide range of clinical applications, such as early detection of OC/EC, the prediction of treatment responses due to the discovery of personalized tumor-related biomarkers, and therapeutic response monitoring.", "Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, Peking Union Medical College Hospital, Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences and Peking Union Medical College, Beijing, People's Republic of China.Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, Peking Union Medical College Hospital, Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences and Peking Union Medical College, Beijing, People's Republic of China.Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, Peking Union Medical College Hospital, Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences and Peking Union Medical College, Beijing, People's Republic of China.Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, Peking Union Medical College Hospital, Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences and Peking Union Medical College, Beijing, People's Republic of China."], "31921706": ["Competition Between Strains of ", "Vector-borne pathogens often consist of genetically distinct strains that can establish co-infections in the vertebrate host and the arthropod vector. Co-infections (or mixed infections) can result in competitive interactions between strains with important consequences for strain abundance and transmission. Here we used the spirochete bacterium, ", "Laboratory of Ecology and Evolution of Parasites, Institute of Biology, University of Neuch\u00e2tel, Neuch\u00e2tel, Switzerland.Laboratory of Ecology and Evolution of Parasites, Institute of Biology, University of Neuch\u00e2tel, Neuch\u00e2tel, Switzerland.Laboratory of Ecology and Epidemiology of Parasites, Institute of Biology, University of Neuch\u00e2tel, Neuch\u00e2tel, Switzerland.Laboratory of Ecology and Evolution of Parasites, Institute of Biology, University of Neuch\u00e2tel, Neuch\u00e2tel, Switzerland.Department of Veterinary Microbiology, Western College of Veterinary Medicine, University of Saskatchewan, Saskatoon, SK, Canada."], "31936409": ["Whole Genome Sequencing for Studying ", "Anthrax is a serious infectious disease caused by the gram-positive and spore-forming bacterium ", "National Reference Center for Whole Genome Sequencing of Microbial Pathogens: Database and Bioinformatic Analysis, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale dell'Abruzzo e del Molise \"G. Caporale\", 64100 Teramo, Italy.Institute for Bacterial Infections and Zoonoses, Friedrich-Loeffler-Institut, 07743 Jena, Germany.Institute for Bacterial Infections and Zoonoses, Friedrich-Loeffler-Institut, 07743 Jena, Germany.Anthrax Reference Institute of Italy, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale della Puglia e della Basilicata, 71121 Foggia, Italy.Anthrax Reference Institute of Italy, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale della Puglia e della Basilicata, 71121 Foggia, Italy.Anthrax Reference Institute of Italy, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale della Puglia e della Basilicata, 71121 Foggia, Italy.National Reference Center for Whole Genome Sequencing of Microbial Pathogens: Database and Bioinformatic Analysis, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale dell'Abruzzo e del Molise \"G. Caporale\", 64100 Teramo, Italy.National Reference Center for Whole Genome Sequencing of Microbial Pathogens: Database and Bioinformatic Analysis, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale dell'Abruzzo e del Molise \"G. Caporale\", 64100 Teramo, Italy.National Reference Center for Whole Genome Sequencing of Microbial Pathogens: Database and Bioinformatic Analysis, Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale dell'Abruzzo e del Molise \"G. Caporale\", 64100 Teramo, Italy.Institute for Bacterial Infections and Zoonoses, Friedrich-Loeffler-Institut, 07743 Jena, Germany."], "32002016": ["Construction of a novel gene-based model for prognosis prediction of clear cell renal cell carcinoma.", "Clear cell renal cell carcinoma (ccRCC) comprises the majority of kidney cancer death worldwide, whose incidence and mortality are not promising. Identifying ideal biomarkers to construct a more accurate prognostic model than conventional clinical parameters is crucial.Raw count of RNA-sequencing data and clinicopathological data were acquired from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA). Tumor samples were divided into two sets. Differentially expressed genes (DEGs) were screened in the whole set and prognosis-related genes were identified from the training set. Their common genes were used in LASSO and best subset regression which were performed to identify the best prognostic 5 genes. The gene-based risk score was developed based on the Cox coefficient of the individual gene. Time-dependent receiver operating characteristic (ROC) and Kaplan-Meier (KM) survival analysis were used to assess its prognostic power. GSE29609 dataset from GEO (Gene Expression Omnibus) database was used to validate the signature. Univariate and multivariate Cox regression were performed to screen independent prognostic parameters to construct a nomogram. The predictive power of the nomogram was revealed by time-dependent ROC curves and the calibration plot and verified in the validation set. Finally, Functional enrichment analysis of DEGs and 5 novel genes were performed to suggest the potential biological pathways.PADI1, ATP6V0D2, DPP6, C9orf135 and PLG were screened to be significantly related to the prognosis of ccRCC patients. The risk score effectively stratified the patients into high-risk group with poor overall survival (OS) based on survival analysis. AJCC-stage, age, recurrence and risk score were regarded as independent prognostic parameters by Cox regression analysis and were used to construct a nomogram. Time-dependent ROC curves showed the nomogram performed best in 1-, 3- and 5-year survival predictions compared with AJCC-stage and risk score in validation sets. The calibration plot showed good agreement of the nomogram between predicted and observed outcomes. Functional enrichment analysis suggested several enriched biological pathways related to cancer.In our study, we constructed a gene-based model integrating clinical prognostic parameters to predict prognosis of ccRCC well, which might provide a reliable prognosis assessment tool for clinician and aid treatment decision-making in the clinic.", "Department of Urology, Guangdong Provincial People's Hospital, Guangdong Academy of Medical Sciences, Guangzhou, China.2Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Urology, Guangdong Provincial People's Hospital, Guangdong Academy of Medical Sciences, Guangzhou, China.2Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Urology, Guangdong Provincial People's Hospital, Guangdong Academy of Medical Sciences, Guangzhou, China.2Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Urology, Guangdong Provincial People's Hospital, Guangdong Academy of Medical Sciences, Guangzhou, China.3Department of Immunology, School of Basic Medical Science, Southern Medical University, Guangzhou, China.Department of Urology, Guangdong Provincial People's Hospital, Guangdong Academy of Medical Sciences, Guangzhou, China.Department of Urology, Guangdong Provincial People's Hospital, Guangdong Academy of Medical Sciences, Guangzhou, China."], "32033243": ["Secondhand Smoke Exposure in Public Places and Support for Smoke-Free Laws in Japan: Findings from the 2018 ITC Japan Survey.", "Comprehensive smoke-free policies such as those called for by the WHO FCTC are the only way to protect the public effectively from the harms of secondhand smoke (SHS), yet Japan has been slow to implement this important health measure. This study examines baseline levels of smoking and SHS exposure in public places and support for smoking bans in Japan prior to the implementation of the 2018 national smoke-free law. Data are from the International Tobacco Control (ITC) Japan Wave 1 Survey (Feb-Mar 2018), a web survey of adult cigarette smokers, heated tobacco product users, dual users, and non-users (total ", "Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Ontario Institute for Cancer Research, 661 University Ave Suite 510, Toronto, ON M5G 0A3, Canada.School of Public Health and Health Systems, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Department of Psychology, University of Waterloo, 200 University Ave W., Waterloo, ON N2L 3G1, Canada.Japan Cancer Society, 13th Floor, Yurakucho Center Bldg. 2-5-1, Yurakucho, Chiyoda-ku, Tokyo 100-0006, Japan.Division of Tobacco Policy Research, National Cancer Center Japan, 5-1-1 Tsukiji, Chuo-ku, Tokyo 104-0045, Japan.Cancer Control Center, Osaka International Cancer Institute, Chome-1-69 Otemae, Chuo Ward, Osaka 541-8567, Japan."], "32059712": ["Genetic diversity of Bacillus anthracis Ames lineage strains in China.", "Anthrax is an endemic disease that persists in the rural regions of China. The global genetic population structure of B.anthracis has also been defined by the canonical single-nucleotide polymorphisms (canSNP) and multiple-locus variable-number tandem repeat analysis (MLVA). Five canSNP lineages were found in China, and the A.Br.Ames lineage has been the second predominant group in recent years in China. The objective of this study was to reveal genetic diversity of the Ames lineage strains by MLVA.Two molecular typing methods, canSNP and MLVA with 15markers were used to study the genetic relationship among the Ames lineage strains. The outbreak information associated with these strains was also collected and investigated.From 2007 to 2018, a total of 21 human anthrax infection outbreaks (68 patients) associated with B. anthracis Ames lineage strains were reported in China. Ames lineage strain-associated human anthrax is mainly distributed in the northern part of China, including the provinces of Inner Mongolia, Liaoning, Gansu, and Xinjiang. In the study, a total of 30 Ames lineage strains were included and 10 MLVA15 genotypes were identified. These strains were mainly found in northeast China, Inner Mongolia and Liaoning. In recent years, the Ames lineage strains were isolated in the two provinces every year. The 18 Ames lineage strains isolated from Inner Mongolia were divided into eight MLVA15 genotypes. From 2010 to 2015, there were continuous reports of outbreaks in Keyouzhongqi County, Inner Mongolia, and the strains that were isolated annually in succession belonged to the MLVA15-30 genotype.The Ames lineage strains are widely distributed in northern China. Their genetic diversity can be illustrated by the results of the MLVA. The genetic characteristics of the Ames lineage strains from outbreaks in different provinces varied. In some areas, human anthrax outbreaks occurred annually in succession, and these related strains grouped together. These observations indicate that the local environment was persistently contaminated with B. anthracis spores, vaccination of livestock should become the fundamental control measure in the areas.", "National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Hangzhou, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Hangzhou, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Hangzhou, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Hangzhou, China.National Institute for Communicable Disease Control and Prevention, Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, Beijing, China. weijianchun@icdc.cn.State Key Laboratory of Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Beijing, China. weijianchun@icdc.cn.Collaborative Innovation Center for Diagnosis and Treatment of Infectious Disease, Hangzhou, China. weijianchun@icdc.cn."], "32065482": ["A risk signature with four autophagy-related genes for predicting survival of glioblastoma multiforme.", "Glioblastoma multiforme (GBM) is a devastating brain tumour without effective treatment. Recent studies have shown that autophagy is a promising therapeutic strategy for GBM. Therefore, it is necessary to identify novel biomarkers associated with autophagy in GBM. In this study, we downloaded autophagy-related genes from Human Autophagy Database (HADb) and Gene Set Enrichment Analysis (GSEA) website. Least absolute shrinkage and selection operator (LASSO) regression and multivariate Cox regression analysis were performed to identify genes for constructing a risk signature. A nomogram was developed by integrating the risk signature with clinicopathological factors. Time-dependent receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve and calibration plot were used to evaluate the efficiency of the prognostic model. Finally, four autophagy-related genes (DIRAS3, LGALS8, MAPK8 and STAM) were identified and were used for constructing a risk signature, which proved to be an independent risk factor for GBM patients. Furthermore, a nomogram was developed based on the risk signature and clinicopathological factors (IDH1 status, age and history of radiotherapy or chemotherapy). ROC curve and calibration plot suggested the nomogram could accurately predict 1-, 3- and 5-year survival rate of GBM patients. For function analysis, the risk signature was associated with apoptosis, necrosis, immunity, inflammation response and MAPK signalling pathway. In conclusion, the risk signature with 4 autophagy-related genes could serve as an independent prognostic factor for GBM patients. Moreover, we developed a nomogram based on the risk signature and clinical traits which was validated to perform better for predicting 1-, 3- and 5-year survival rate of GBM.", "Department of Neurosurgery, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Wuxi School of Medicine, Jiangnan University, Wuxi, China.Department of Neurosurgery, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Neurosurgery, The First Hospital of China Medical University, Shenyang, China.Department of Stomatology, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China.Department of Neurosurgery, The First Affiliated Hospital of Shantou University Medical College, Shantou, China."], "32098121": ["Genomic Profiling of Uterine Aspirates and cfDNA as an Integrative Liquid Biopsy Strategy in Endometrial Cancer.", "The incidence and mortality of endometrial cancer (EC) have risen in recent years, hence more precise management is needed. Therefore, we combined different types of liquid biopsies to better characterize the genetic landscape of EC in a non-invasive and dynamic manner. Uterine aspirates (UAs) from 60 patients with EC were obtained during surgery and analyzed by next-generation sequencing (NGS). Blood samples, collected at surgery, were used for cell-free DNA (cfDNA) and circulating tumor cell (CTC) analyses. Finally, personalized therapies were tested in patient-derived xenografts (PDXs) generated from the UAs. NGS analyses revealed the presence of genetic alterations in 93% of the tumors. Circulating tumor DNA (ctDNA) was present in 41.2% of cases, mainly in patients with high-risk tumors, thus indicating a clear association with a more aggressive disease. Accordingly, the results obtained during the post-surgery follow-up indicated the presence of ctDNA in three patients with progressive disease. Moreover, 38.9% of patients were positive for CTCs at surgery. Finally, the efficacy of targeted therapies based on the UA-specific mutational landscape was demonstrated in PDX models. Our study indicates the potential clinical applicability of a personalized strategy based on a combination of different liquid biopsies to characterize and monitor tumor evolution, and to identify targeted therapies.", "Translational Medical Oncology Group (Oncomet), Health Research Institute of Santiago de Compostela (IDIS), University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Foundation MD Anderson International, C/G\u00f3mez Hemans 2, 28033 Madrid, Spain.Biomedical Research Group in Gynecology, Vall d'Hebron Research Institute (VHIR), Universitat Autonoma de Barcelona, 119-129 Pg. Vall d'Hebron, 08035 Barcelona, Spain.Nasasbiotech, S.L., Canton Grande 3, 15003 A Coru\u00f1a, Spain.Nasasbiotech, S.L., Canton Grande 3, 15003 A Coru\u00f1a, Spain.Translational Medical Oncology Group (Oncomet), Health Research Institute of Santiago de Compostela (IDIS), University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Biomedical Research Group in Gynecology, Vall d'Hebron Research Institute (VHIR), Universitat Autonoma de Barcelona, 119-129 Pg. Vall d'Hebron, 08035 Barcelona, Spain.Foundation MD Anderson International, C/G\u00f3mez Hemans 2, 28033 Madrid, Spain.Department of Gynecology, MD Anderson Cancer Center, 28029 Madrid, Spain.Biomedical Research Group in Gynecology, Vall d'Hebron Research Institute (VHIR), Universitat Autonoma de Barcelona, 119-129 Pg. Vall d'Hebron, 08035 Barcelona, Spain.Department of Gynecology, University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Department of Pathology, University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Department of Gynecology, University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Translational Medical Oncology Group (Oncomet), Health Research Institute of Santiago de Compostela (IDIS), University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Biomedical Research Group in Gynecology, Vall d'Hebron Research Institute (VHIR), Universitat Autonoma de Barcelona, 119-129 Pg. Vall d'Hebron, 08035 Barcelona, Spain.Centro de Investigaci\u00f3n Biom\u00e9dica en Red de C\u00e1ncer (CIBERONC), Monforte de Lemos 3-5, 28029 Madrid, Spain.Department of Gynecology, University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Biomedical Research Group in Gynecology, Vall d'Hebron Research Institute (VHIR), Universitat Autonoma de Barcelona, 119-129 Pg. Vall d'Hebron, 08035 Barcelona, Spain.Centro de Investigaci\u00f3n Biom\u00e9dica en Red de C\u00e1ncer (CIBERONC), Monforte de Lemos 3-5, 28029 Madrid, Spain.Translational Medical Oncology Group (Oncomet), Health Research Institute of Santiago de Compostela (IDIS), University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Nasasbiotech, S.L., Canton Grande 3, 15003 A Coru\u00f1a, Spain.Centro de Investigaci\u00f3n Biom\u00e9dica en Red de C\u00e1ncer (CIBERONC), Monforte de Lemos 3-5, 28029 Madrid, Spain.Foundation MD Anderson International, C/G\u00f3mez Hemans 2, 28033 Madrid, Spain.Centro de Investigaci\u00f3n Biom\u00e9dica en Red de C\u00e1ncer (CIBERONC), Monforte de Lemos 3-5, 28029 Madrid, Spain.Department of Biochemistry, Autonomic University of Madrid (UAM), Biomedical research Institute 'Alberto Sols' (CSIC-UAM), IdiPaz, Arzobispo Morcillo 4, 28029 Madrid, Spain.Translational Medical Oncology Group (Oncomet), Health Research Institute of Santiago de Compostela (IDIS), University Hospital of Santiago de Compostela (SERGAS), Trav. Choupana s/n, 15706 Santiago de Compostela, Spain.Centro de Investigaci\u00f3n Biom\u00e9dica en Red de C\u00e1ncer (CIBERONC), Monforte de Lemos 3-5, 28029 Madrid, Spain."], "32098190": ["Collaborating with Complementary and Alternative Medicine (CAM) Providers When Writing HPV Vaccine Review Articles.", "Novel strategies are needed to address vaccine hesitancy (VH), which correlates with complementary and alternative medicine (CAM). In Switzerland, CAM providers play important roles in vaccine counseling of vaccine hesitant (VH) parents, and traditional vaccination messaging tends to overlook CAM provider perspectives. In the setting of a Swiss national research program on VH, our key strategy has been to work together closely with CAM providers. To assess the feasibility of generating educational human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine materials that would interest VH healthcare providers (HCPs), we invited four CAM providers to co-author two HPV vaccine review articles for general practitioners. We conducted thematic analysis of CAM provider comments to identify patterns that could complement and improve vaccination messaging from CAM perspectives. We identified several themes and generated an inventory of CAM provider messaging recommendations related to language use, presentation of background information, nuanced statements regarding HPV vaccine efficacy and safety, and communication tools that would be important to VH HCPs. Contrary to our initial expectations, and in an inclusive, respectful atmosphere of open dialogue, we were able to productively finalize our manuscripts. In the opinion of the CAM co-authors, the manuscripts effectively considered the communication needs and perspectives of VH HCPs. Engaging with CAM providers appears to be a feasible and innovative avenue for providing vaccine information and designing communication tools aimed at VH healthcare providers.", "Swiss Tropical and Public Health Institute (Swiss TPH), 4051 Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, 4051 Basel, Switzerland.University of Basel, 4051 Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine and Infectious Diseases Service, Kantonsspital Baselland, 4101 Bruderholz, Switzerland.Department of Pediatrics, Klinik Arlesheim, 4144 Arlesheim, Switzerland.Association of Swiss Complementary Medicine Physicians Associations (UNION) and Private Practice, Richterswil, 8805 Zurich, Switzerland.Private Practice, Au, 8804 Zurich, Switzerland.Division of Infectious Diseases, University Children's Hospital Zurich, University of Zurich, 8032 Zurich, Switzerland.Swiss Federal Vaccination Commission, 3003 Berne, Switzerland.Institute for Public Communication, Universit\u00e0 della Svizzera italiana, 6900 Lugano, Switzerland.Swiss School of Public Health, 8001 Zurich, Switzerland.Center for Integrative Pediatrics, Department of Pediatrics, Fribourg Hospital HFR, 1752 Fribourg, Switzerland.Faculty of Science and Medicine, University of Fribourg, 1700 Fribourg, Switzerland.University of Basel, 4051 Basel, Switzerland.University Department of Medicine and Infectious Diseases Service, Kantonsspital Baselland, 4101 Bruderholz, Switzerland."], "32312323": ["A molecular survey of vector-borne pathogens and haemoplasmas in owned cats across Italy.", "Feline vector-borne pathogens (FeVBPs) have been increasingly investigated for their impact on cat health and their zoonotic potential. The aim of the present study was to assess the prevalence of FeVBPs and haemoplasmas in cats across Italy and to identify potential risk factors linked to their occurrence.Blood samples from 958 owned cats living in the North (n\u2009=\u2009556), Centre (n\u2009=\u2009173) and South (n\u2009=\u2009229) of Italy were tested for Babesia spp., Hepatozoon spp., Ehrlichia spp., Anaplasma spp. and filarioids by conventional PCR (cPCR) and for haemoplasmas and Bartonella spp. by SYBR green real-time PCR. Cats included in the study represent a sub-sample from a larger number of animals enrolled in a previous study, which were selected based on the geographical origin. Data on cats' positivity for Leishmania infantum, feline leukaemia virus (FeLV) and for feline immunodeficiency virus (FIV), available from the previous study, were included and examined. Potential risk factors for pathogen infection were assessed in relationship to categorical variables including sex, geographical origin, breed, neutering status and age of cats.Out of the 958 cats, 194 (20.2%) were positive for at least one of the tested pathogens, 89 (16%) from the North, 32 (18.5%) from the Centre and 73 (31.9%) from the South of Italy. A high prevalence of FeVBPs was detected in male cats (n\u2009=\u2009125, 27.8%), living in the southern part of the country (n\u2009=\u200973, 31.9%), younger than 18 months of age (n\u2009=\u200924, 22.4%) and not neutered (n\u2009=\u200939; 27.5%). In particular, 24 cats (2.5%) tested PCR-positive for Bartonella spp., of which 1.6% for B. henselae and 0.9% for B. clarridgeiae. A total of 111 cats scored PCR-positive for haemoplasmas (11.6%), specifically \"Candidatus Mycoplasma haemominutum\" (n\u2009=\u200995, 9.9%), M. haemofelis (n\u2009=\u200914, 1.5%) and \"Candidatus Mycoplasma turicensis\" (n\u2009=\u20092, 0.2%). Moreover, 39, 31 and 8 cats were positive for FeLV (4.1%), L. infantum (3.2%) and FIV (0.8%), respectively. Co-infections were registered for 19 (9.8%) cats.These results confirm the occurrence of haemoplasmas and FeVBPs throughout Italy. Preventive measures to protect both animal and human health should be carried out also for owned cats, even if no health status of animals has been assessed in this study.", "Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, Valenzano, Bari, Italy.Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, Valenzano, Bari, Italy.Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale delle Venezie, Legnaro, Padova, Italy.San Marco Veterinary Clinic and Laboratory, Veggiano, Padova, Italy.Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale delle Venezie, Legnaro, Padova, Italy.Istituto Zooprofilattico Sperimentale delle Venezie, Legnaro, Padova, Italy.Bayer Animal Health GmbH, Leverkusen, Germany.Department of Population Health and Reproduction, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California, Davis, USA.Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, Valenzano, Bari, Italy.Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, Valenzano, Bari, Italy.Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, Valenzano, Bari, Italy.Department of Immunology, Aggeu Magalh\u00e3es Institute, Funda\u00e7\u00e3o Oswaldo Cruz (Fiocruz), Recife, Brazil.Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, Valenzano, Bari, Italy. domenico.otranto@uniba.it.Department of Pathobiology, Faculty of Veterinary Science, Bu-Ali Sina University, Felestin Sq., Hamedan, Iran. domenico.otranto@uniba.it."], "32328167": ["Viral disease emergence in shrimp aquaculture: origins, impact and the effectiveness of health management strategies.", "Shrimp aquaculture has grown rapidly over several decades to become a major global industry that serves the increasing consumer demand for seafood and has contributed significantly to socio-economic development in many poor coastal communities. However, the ecological disturbances and changes in patterns of trade associated with the development of shrimp farming have presented many of the pre-conditions for the emergence and spread of disease. Shrimp are displaced from their natural environments, provided artificial or alternative feeds, stocked in high density, exposed to stress through changes in water quality and are transported nationally and internationally, either live or as frozen product. These practices have provided opportunities for increased pathogenicity of existing infections, exposure to new pathogens, and the rapid transmission and transboundary spread of disease. Not surprisingly, a succession of new viral diseases has devastated the production and livelihoods of farmers and their sustaining communities. This review examines the major viral pathogens of farmed shrimp, the likely reasons for their emergence and spread, and the consequences for the structure and operation of the shrimp farming industry. In addition, this review discusses the health management strategies that have been introduced to combat the major pathogens and the reasons that disease continues to have an impact, particularly on poor, small-holder farmers in Asia.", "\u2002CSIRO Livestock Industries, Australian Animal Health Laboratory, Geelong, Vic., Australia.\u2002Network of Aquaculture Centers Asia-Pacific (NACA), Kasetsart University Campus, Ladyao, Jatujak, Bangkok, Thailand."], "32352416": ["The potential value of histological analysis of thrombi extracted through mechanical thrombectomy during acute ischemic stroke treatment.", "Studies on thrombus composition in acute stroke or acute myocardial infarction may help elucidate clot etiology and understand reperfusion success or failure. Moreover, such studies may certainly aid in the development of new technologies aimed at retrieving specific subtypes of thrombi; as a matter of fact, thrombus composition is suggested to influence the choice of techniques used during mechanical thrombectomy and plays a role in potential device and thrombus interaction. Over the years, histological analysis on the composition of thrombi causing ischemic stroke has proved to be a powerful tool to set standard prevention and treatment protocols. By isolating clot components, it is possible to provide a more accurate diagnosis and distinguish different stroke subtypes. Studies on histological clot composition support the theory that cryptogenic stroke can have a cardiogenic origin too. Components found in thrombi extracted from stroke patients support the importance of antithrombotic therapy in preventing and treating cerebral ischemia; however, more studies are needed to improve results in all types and subtypes of stroke. Hence, more research is required to further comprehend the role that platelets, fibrin, von Willebrand factor (vWF), and DNA play in relation to mechanical thrombectomy and recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (rtPA) resistance and to overcome certain limitations.", "3rd Department of Internal Medicine-Cardiology, University Hospital Kralovske Vinohrady and Third Faculty of Medicine, Charles University; Prague-Czech Republic.3rd Department of Internal Medicine-Cardiology, University Hospital Kralovske Vinohrady and Third Faculty of Medicine, Charles University; Prague-Czech Republic."], "32381047": ["First record of experimentally induced salmon gill poxvirus disease (SGPVD) in Atlantic salmon (Salmo salar L.).", "Salmon gill poxvirus (SGPV) infection is a common denominator in many cases of complex gill disease in the Norwegian salmon farming industry and may, as a single agent infection, result in salmon poxvirus disease (SGPVD). Experiences from the field suggest that stress may be a decisive factor for the induction of SGPVD. Here we investigated the effect of stress hormone treatment on SGPV kinetics and disease development. In our experiment, Atlantic salmon were divided into four groups. Two groups of fish received an intraperitoneal injection of hydrocortisone dissolved in a fatty vehicle, whereas fish in the other two groups received a sham injection of the vehicle. After 24\u00a0h, one group with hydrocortisone injection and one with sham injection were exposed to dead SGPV-infected fish. Plasma cortisol level, virus kinetics, virus localization, and pathological gill were monitored for 4 weeks post-exposure. Hydrocortisone injected fish displayed higher plasma cortisol and SGPV loads than non-hydrocortisone treated fish. Signs of SGPVD and ensuing mortality appeared only in fish exposed to the virus and injected with hydrocortisone around 2 weeks post-exposure. No clinical signs of disease or mortality were recorded in the other groups. Further, gill histopathology in diseased fish correlated well with SGPV load, with the infection apparently confined to gill epithelial cells. The current findings suggest elevated plasma cortisol being a prerequisite for the development of SGPVD and recommend minimization of stressful farming activities, particularly if SGPV infection has been previously identified.", "Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Sisomar AS, Trollbukta, 8226, Straumen, Norway.Department of Molecular Biology, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway.Department of Fish Health and Welfare, Norwegian Veterinary Institute, PO Box 750 Sentrum, 0106, Oslo, Norway. mona.gjessing@vetinst.no."], "32432045": ["Construction and Validation of an Autophagy-Related Prognostic Risk Signature for Survival Predicting in Clear Cell Renal Cell Carcinoma Patients.", "", "Department of Nephrology, Sir Run Run Shaw Hospital, Zhejiang University School of Medicine, Hangzhou, China.Department of Nephrology, Sir Run Run Shaw Hospital, Zhejiang University School of Medicine, Hangzhou, China.Department of Nephrology, Sir Run Run Shaw Hospital, Zhejiang University School of Medicine, Hangzhou, China."], "32477039": ["Exposure to secondhand smoke in hospitality settings in Ghana: Evidence of changes since implementation of smoke-free legislation.", "Ghana has a partial smoking ban with smoking allowed in designated smoking areas. Studies evaluating smoke-free laws are scarce in Sub-Saharan Africa. Evaluation of smoke-free laws is an effective means of measuring progress towards a smoke-free society. This study assessed the level of compliance to the provisions of the current smoke-free policy using air quality measurements for fine particulate matter (PMThis was a cross-sectional observational study conducted in 2019 using a structured observational checklist complemented with air quality measurements using Dylos monitors across 152 randomly selected hospitality venues in three large cities in Ghana.Smoking was observed in a third of the venues visited. The median indoor PMThe study shows that while smoking and SHS exposure continues in a substantial number of hospitality venues, there is a marked improvement in PM", "School of Public Health, College of Health Sciences, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.African Centre for Clean Air, Kampala, Uganda.University of Stirling, Stirling, United Kingdom.Usher Institute, University of Edinburgh, Edinburgh, United Kingdom.Faculty of Social Sciences, Tampere University, Tampere, Finland.School of Public Health, College of Health Sciences, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.School of Public Health, College of Health Sciences, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.Usher Institute, University of Edinburgh, Edinburgh, United Kingdom.Department of Mathematics, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.King's College London, London, United Kingdom.School of Public Health, College of Health Sciences, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana."], "32547516": ["Genotyping of Salmon Gill Poxvirus Reveals One Main Predominant Lineage in Europe, Featuring Fjord- and Fish Farm-Specific Sub-Lineages.", "Salmon gill poxvirus (SGPV) can cause serious gill disease in Atlantic salmon (", "Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Department of Molecular Biology, Norwegian Institute of Public Health, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Faroese Food and Veterinary Authority, T\u00f3rshavn, Faroe Islands.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.Norwegian Veterinary Institute, Oslo, Norway.The Norwegian College of Fishery Science, Faculty of Biosciences, Fisheries and Economics, UiT - The Arctic University of Norway, Troms\u00f8, Norway."], "32580384": ["Molecular Epidemiology of B3 and D8 Measles Viruses through Hemagglutinin Phylogenetic History.", "Of the 24 known measles genotypes, only D8 and B3 are responsible for outbreaks in the last years in Europe, Asia, and America. In this study the H gene of 92 strains circulating between 2015 and 2019 in Lombardy, Northern Italy, and 1273 H sequences available in GenBank were analyzed in order to evaluate the genetic variability and to assess the conservation of the immunodominant sites. Overall, in Lombardy we observed the presence of four different B3 and three different D8 clusters, each one of them including sequences derived from viruses found in both vaccinated and unvaccinated subjects. Worldwide, the residue 400 within the H protein, a position located within the main immune epitope, is mutated in all circulating strains that belong to the two globally endemic genotypes, B3 and D8. Our data demonstrate the usefulness of measles virus (MV) H gene sequencing. Indeed, the monitoring the H protein epitopes of circulating strains could be included in the measles laboratory surveillance activities in order to improve and optimize strategies for measles control, as countries go towards elimination phase.", "Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Biology, Memorial University of Newfoundland, 232 Elizabeth Ave., St. John's, NL A1B 3X9, Canada.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Infectious Diseases, National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella, Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0, Viale Regina Elena, 299, 00161 Rome, Italy.Department of Infectious Diseases, National Reference Laboratory for Measles and Rubella, Istituto Superiore di Sanit\u00e0, Viale Regina Elena, 299, 00161 Rome, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Coordinated Research Center \"EpiSoMI\", University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Department of Biomedical Sciences for Health, University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy.Coordinated Research Center \"EpiSoMI\", University of Milan, via Carlo Pascal 36, 20133 Milan, Italy."], "32736522": ["Molecular characterization of B. anthracis isolates from the anthrax outbreak among cattle in Karnataka, India.", "Anthrax, a zoonotic disease is caused by the Gram positive bacterium Bacillus anthracis. During January 2013, an anthrax outbreak among cattle was reported in Gundlupet Taluk, neighboring Bandipur National Park and tiger reserve, India. The present study aims at the molecular identification and characterization of 12 B. anthracis isolates from this outbreak by 16S rRNA gene sequencing, screening B. anthracis specific prophages and chromosomal markers, protective antigen (pag) gene and canonical single nucleotide polymorphism (canSNP) analysis to subtype the isolates into one of the twelve globally identified clonal sub-lineages of B. anthracis.These isolates had identical 16S rDNA nucleotide sequences with B. anthracis specific dual peaks showing mixed base pair R (G/A) at position 1139 with visual inspection while the automated basecaller software indicated a G. Alternatively the nucleotide A at 1146 position was indicative of the 16S rDNA type 7. Multiple sequence alignment with additional 170 (16S rDNA) sequences of B. cereus sensu lato group from GenBank database revealed 28 new 16S types in addition to eleven 16S types reported earlier. The twelve B. anthracis isolates were found to harbor the four B. anthracis specific prophages (lambdaBa01, lambdaBa02, lambdaBa03, and lambdaBa04) along with its four specific loci markers (dhp 61.183, dhp 77.002, dhp 73.019, and dhp 73.017). The pag gene sequencing identified the isolates as protective antigen (PA) genotype I with phenylalanine-proline-alanine phenotype (FPA phenotype). However, sequence clustering with additional 34 pag sequences from GenBank revealed two additional missense mutations at nucleotide positions 196\u2009bp and 869\u2009bp of the 2294\u2009bp pag sequence among the 5 B. cereus strains with pXO1 like plasmids. The canSNP analysis showed that the isolates belong to A.Br.Aust94 sub-lineage that is distributed geographically in countries of Asia, Africa, Europe and Australia.The analysis of 16S rDNA sequences reiterated the earlier findings that visual inspection of electropherogram for position 1139 having nucleotide R could be used for B. anthracis identification and not the consensus sequence from base caller. The canSNP results indicated that the anthrax outbreak among cattle was caused by B. anthracis of A.Br.Aust94 sub-lineage.", "Microbiology Division, Defence Food Research Laboratory, Siddartha Nagar, Mysore, Karnataka, 570011, India.Microbiology Division, Defence Food Research Laboratory, Siddartha Nagar, Mysore, Karnataka, 570011, India.Microbiology Division, Defence Food Research Laboratory, Siddartha Nagar, Mysore, Karnataka, 570011, India. joseph@dfrl.drdo.in.Microbiology Division, Defence Food Research Laboratory, Siddartha Nagar, Mysore, Karnataka, 570011, India."], "32969836": ["Prognostic landscape of tumor-infiltrating immune cells and immune-related genes in the tumor microenvironment of gastric cancer.", "The tumor microenvironment is closely related to the progression and immune escape of tumor cells. Tumor-infiltrating immune cells (TIICs) and immune-related genes (IRGs) are indispensable components of the tumor microenvironment and have been demonstrated to be highly valuable in determining the prognosis of multiple cancers. To elucidate the prognostic value of TIICs and IRGs in gastric cancer, we conducted a comprehensive analysis focusing on the abundances of 22 types of TIICs and differentially expressed IRGs based on a dataset from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA). The results showed that great composition differences in TIICs and immune cell subfractions were associated with survival outcomes in different stages. Additionally, 29 hub genes were characterized from 345 differentially expressed IRGs and found to be significantly associated with survival outcomes. Then, an independent prognostic indicator based on ten IRGs was successfully constructed after multivariate adjustment for some clinical parameters. Further validation revealed that these hub IRGs could reflect the infiltration levels of immune cells. Thus, our results confirmed the clinical significance of TIICs and IRGs in gastric cancer and may establish a foundation for further exploring immune cell and gene targets for personalized treatment.", "Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Key Laboratory of Environmental Pollution Monitoring and Disease Control, Ministry of Education, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Affiliated Tumor Hospital, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550004, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Key Laboratory of Environmental Pollution Monitoring and Disease Control, Ministry of Education, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Key Laboratory of Environmental Pollution Monitoring and Disease Control, Ministry of Education, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China.Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, School of Biology and Engineering/School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang 550025, Guizhou, P.R. China."], "33001978": ["Transmission of Bartonella henselae within Rhipicephalus sanguineus: Data on the Potential Vector Role of the Tick.", "Bartonella henselae is a fastidious intraerythrocytic, gram-negative bacteria that causes cat scratch disease in humans. Ixodes ricinus has been confirmed to be a competent vector of B. henselae, and some indirect evidences from clinical cases and epidemiological studies also suggested that some other tick species, including Rhipicephalus sanguineus, may transmit the bacteria. B. henselae has been detected in R. sanguineus but no experimental investigations have been performed to evaluate the vector competency of this tick species regarding B. henselae transmission. To this end, this work aimed to assess the transstadial transmission of B. henselae between larvae and nymphs of R. sanguineus as well as transmission by nymphs infected at the larval stage. Four hundred B. henselae negative larvae were fed with B. henselae-infected blood by using an artificial membrane feeding system. After five days of feeding, B. henselae was detected by PCR in 57.1% (8/14) of engorged larval pools, 66.7% (4/6) of semi-engorged larval pools, and 66.7% (2/3) of larval feces pools. After molting, B. henselae DNA was also detected in 10% (1/10) of nymph pools, but not in tick feces. After a pre-fed step of nymphs infected at the larval stage on non-infected blood meal, B. henselae was detected by PCR in blood sample from the feeder, but no Bartonella colonies could be obtained from culture. These findings showed that B. henselae could be transstadial transmitted from R. sanguineus larvae to nymphs, and also suggest that these nymphs may retransmitted the bacteria through the saliva during their blood meal. This is the first study that validated the artificial membrane feeding system for maintaining R. sanguineus tick colony. It shows the possibility of transstadial transmission of B. henselae from R. sanguineus larvae to nymphs.", "Department of Veterinary Medicine, College of Veterinary Medicine, National Pingtung University of Science and Technology, Pingtung, Taiwan.UMR BIPAR, INRAE, Ecole V\u00e9t\u00e9rinaire d'Alfort, ANSES, Universit\u00e9 Paris-Est, Maisons-Alfort, France.Department of Veterinary Medicine, College of Veterinary Medicine, National Pingtung University of Science and Technology, Pingtung, Taiwan.Department of Veterinary Medicine, School of Veterinary Medicine, National Chung Hsing University, Taichung, Taiwan.Department of Veterinary Medicine, College of Veterinary Medicine, National Pingtung University of Science and Technology, Pingtung, Taiwan."], "33036449": ["Emergence and Spread of ", "", "Unit for Fish and Shellfish Diseases, National Institute of Aquatic Resources, Technical University of Denmark, 2800 Kgs. Lyngby, Denmark.Unit for Fish and Shellfish Diseases, National Institute of Aquatic Resources, Technical University of Denmark, 2800 Kgs. Lyngby, Denmark.Unit for Fish and Shellfish Diseases, National Institute of Aquatic Resources, Technical University of Denmark, 2800 Kgs. Lyngby, Denmark.NMBU, Department of Food Safety and Infection Biology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Norwegian University of Life Sciences, 0454 Oslo, Norway.Dansk Akvakultur, 8200 Aarhus, Denmark.Unit for Fish and Shellfish Diseases, National Institute of Aquatic Resources, Technical University of Denmark, 2800 Kgs. Lyngby, Denmark.Unit for Fish and Shellfish Diseases, National Institute of Aquatic Resources, Technical University of Denmark, 2800 Kgs. Lyngby, Denmark.Unit for Fish and Shellfish Diseases, National Institute of Aquatic Resources, Technical University of Denmark, 2800 Kgs. Lyngby, Denmark."], "33072571": ["Immune-Stromal Score Signature: Novel Prognostic Tool of the Tumor Microenvironment in Lung Adenocarcinoma.", "", "Department of Oncology, Chinese PLA General Hospital, Beijing, China.Department of Health Management, Chinese PLA General Hospital, Beijing, China.Department of Oncology, Chinese PLA General Hospital, Beijing, China.Department of Oncology, Chinese PLA General Hospital, Beijing, China.Department of Oncology, Chinese PLA General Hospital, Beijing, China.Department of Bio-therapeutic, Chinese PLA General Hospital, Beijing, China."], "33178587": ["Development and Validation of Autophagy-Related Gene Signature and Nomogram for Predicting Survival in Oral Squamous Cell Carcinoma.", "Autophagy, a highly conserved self-digesting process, has been deeply involved in the development and progression of oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC). However, the prognostic value of autophagy-related genes (ARGs) for OSCC still remains unclear. Our study set out to develop a multigene expression signature based on ARGs for individualized prognosis assessment in OSCC patients.Based on The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) database, we identified prognosis-related ARGs through univariate COX regression analysis. Then we performed the least absolute shrinkage and selection operator (LASSO) regression analysis to identify an optimal autophagy-related multigene signature with the subsequent validation in testing set, GSE41613 and GSE42743 datasets.We identified 36 prognosis-related ARGs for OSCC. Subsequently, the multigene signature based on 13 prognostic ARGs was constructed and successfully divided OSCC patients into low and high-risk groups with significantly different overall survival in TCGA training set (In summary, we identified and verified a 13-ARGs prognostic signature and nomogram, which provide individualized prognosis evaluation and show insight for potential therapeutic targets for OSCC.", "Department of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery, Guanghua School of Stomatology, Hospital of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Guangdong Provincial Key Laboratory of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Department of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery, Guanghua School of Stomatology, Hospital of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Guangdong Provincial Key Laboratory of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Department of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery, Guanghua School of Stomatology, Hospital of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Guangdong Provincial Key Laboratory of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Department of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery, Guanghua School of Stomatology, Hospital of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Guangdong Provincial Key Laboratory of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Department of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery, Guanghua School of Stomatology, Hospital of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Guangdong Provincial Key Laboratory of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Department of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery, Guanghua School of Stomatology, Hospital of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China.Guangdong Provincial Key Laboratory of Stomatology, Sun Yat-sen University, Guangzhou, China."], "33193664": ["Identification of Proteins of Tobacco Mosaic Virus by Using a Method of Feature Extraction.", "Tobacco mosaic virus, TMV for short, is widely distributed in the global tobacco industry and has a significant impact on tobacco production. It can reduce the amount of tobacco grown by 50-70%. In this research of study, we aimed to identify tobacco mosaic virus proteins and healthy tobacco leaf proteins by using machine learning approaches. The experiment's results showed that the support vector machine algorithm achieved high accuracy in different feature extraction methods. And 188-dimensions feature extraction method improved the classification accuracy. In that the support vector machine algorithm and 188-dimensions feature extraction method were finally selected as the final experimental methods. In the 10-fold cross-validation processes, the SVM combined with 188-dimensions achieved 93.5% accuracy on the training set and 92.7% accuracy on the independent validation set. Besides, the evaluation index of the results of experiments indicate that the method developed by us is valid and robust.", "Information and Computer Engineering College, Northeast Forestry University, Harbin, China.Information and Computer Engineering College, Northeast Forestry University, Harbin, China.Information and Computer Engineering College, Northeast Forestry University, Harbin, China."], "33215088": ["OptimalTTF-1: Enhancing tumor treating fields therapy with skull remodeling surgery. A clinical phase I trial in adult recurrent glioblastoma.", "Preclinical studies suggest that skull remodeling surgery (SR-surgery) increases the dose of tumor treating fields (TTFields) in glioblastoma (GBM) and prevents wasteful current shunting through the skin. SR-surgery introduces minor skull defects to focus the cancer-inhibiting currents toward the tumor and increase the treatment dose. This study aimed to test the safety and feasibility of this concept in a phase I setting.Fifteen adult patients with the first recurrence of GBM were treated with personalized SR-surgery, TTFields, and physician's choice oncological therapy. The primary endpoint was toxicity and secondary endpoints included standard efficacy outcomes.SR-surgery resulted in a mean skull defect area of 10.6 cmTTFields therapy combined with SR-surgery and medical oncological treatment is safe and nontoxic and holds the potential to improve the outcome for GBM patients through focal dose enhancement in the tumor.", "Department of Neurosurgery, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Clinical Medicine, Aarhus University, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Oncology, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Danish Centre for Particle Therapy, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Neuroradiology, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus Denmark.Department of Neurology, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Oncology, Aalborg University Hospital, Aalborg, Denmark.Department of Neurosurgery, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Clinical Medicine, Aarhus University, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Neurosurgery, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Neurosurgery, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Neurosurgery, Aarhus University Hospital, Aarhus, Denmark.Department of Clinical Medicine, Aarhus University, Aarhus, Denmark."], "33228674": ["The role of the media on maternal confidence in provider HPV recommendation.", "Despite a growing understanding of the importance of provider HPV recommendation on parental acceptance, U.S. HPV vaccination rates remain suboptimal. Given the prevalence and use of the media for health decisions, this study examined the relationship between the media and provider HPV recommendation on maternal HPV vaccine hesitancy.Thirty individual interviews with HPV vaccine-accepting mothers in the Midwest U.S. were conducted to examine their feelings of hesitancy around the decision to accept HPV vaccination at the time of provider recommendation and their suggestions for improving the recommendation experience by addressing media concerns.Media exposure was an antecedent to hesitancy for three main vaccination concerns: safety, protection/efficacy and sexual stigma. Although mothers accepted vaccination, they continued to feel confused and hesitant about HPV vaccination. They had several recommendations for how providers could combat hesitancy to improve confidence in HPV vaccine acceptance.Providers' approach to HPV vaccination recommendation must consider concerns reported in the media with delivery techniques modified to adjust to maternal fears absorbed from adverse media information.", "Zimmerman School of Advertising and Mass Communications, University of South Florida, 4202 E Fowler Avenue, CIS1040, Tampa, FL, 33620, USA. walkerk1@usf.edu.College of Public Health, University of South Florida, Tampa, USA.Department of Pediatrics, Indiana University School of Medicine, Indianapolis, USA."], "33233535": ["Vaccination Attitude and Communication in Early Settings: An Exploratory Study.", "", "Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Sardegna, Regional Health Authority, 09123 Cagliari, Italy.Sardegna, Agency for Health Care, ASSL Nuoro, Via Piemonte, Macomer, 08015 Nuoro, Italy.Sardegna, Agency for Health Care, ASSL Cagliari, Via Sonnino, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.University Hospital of Cagliari, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy.Department of Medical Science and Public Health, University of Cagliari, University Campus of Monserrato, 09125 Cagliari, Italy."], "33302522": ["Arthropod-Borne Pathogens in Stray Cats from Northern Italy: A Serological and Molecular Survey.", "Cats may be affected by a wide range of arthropod-borne pathogens (ABPs) of medical and veterinary interest. Between February 2018 and October 2019, 85 blood samples were collected from stray cats from the Emilia Romagna region (northern Italy). Ticks (", "Department of Veterinary Sciences, University of Pisa, Viale delle Piagge 2, 56124 Pisa, Italy.Department of Veterinary Sciences, University of Pisa, Viale delle Piagge 2, 56124 Pisa, Italy.Department of Veterinary Sciences, University of Pisa, Viale delle Piagge 2, 56124 Pisa, Italy.Department of Veterinary Sciences, University of Pisa, Viale delle Piagge 2, 56124 Pisa, Italy.Department of Veterinary Sciences, University of Pisa, Viale delle Piagge 2, 56124 Pisa, Italy.Department of Veterinary Sciences, University of Pisa, Viale delle Piagge 2, 56124 Pisa, Italy."], "33303664": ["Retrospective Analysis of the Relationship between Two Anthrax Outbreaks in Kazakhstan Based on Genomic Data.", "We present a retrospective analysis of strains from two anthrax outbreaks in western Kazakhstan in 2009. The outbreaks occurred during the same period and in the same area located close to main roads, favoring a single source of infection. However, multilocus variable-number tandem-repeat analysis (MLVA), canonical single-nucleotide polymorphism (CanSNP) analysis, and genome-wide analysis demonstrated that the outbreaks were not connected.", "National Center for Biotechnology, Nur-Sultan, Kazakhstan ncbshevtsov@gmail.com.Universit\u00e9 Paris-Saclay, Institute for Integrative Biology of the Cell (I2BC), Gif-sur-Yvette, France.National Center for Biotechnology, Nur-Sultan, Kazakhstan.M. Aikimbayev's National Scientific Center for Especially Dangerous Infections, Almaty, Kazakhstan.M. Aikimbayev's National Scientific Center for Especially Dangerous Infections, Almaty, Kazakhstan.National Center for Biotechnology, Nur-Sultan, Kazakhstan.National Center for Biotechnology, Nur-Sultan, Kazakhstan.School of Science and Technology, Nazarbayev University, Nur-Sultan, Kazakhstan."], "33330624": ["Development of an Immunogenomic Landscape-Based Prognostic Index of Head and Neck Squamous Cell Carcinoma.", "Head and neck squamous cell carcinoma (HNSCC) is the eighth leading cancer by incidence worldwide, with approximately 700,000 new cases in 2018 (accounting for 11% of all cancers). The occurrence and development of tumors are closely related to the immunological function of the body and sensitivity to treatment schemes as well as prognosis. It is urgent for clinicians to systematically study patients' immune gene maps to help select a treatment plan and analyze the potential to cure HNSCC. Here, the transcriptomic data of HNSCC samples were downloaded from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA), and 4,793 genes differentially expressed in normal and cancer tissues of HNSCC were identified, including 1,182 downregulated and 3,611 upregulated genes. From these genes, 400 differentially expressed immune-related genes (IRGs) were extracted, including 95 downregulated genes and 305 upregulated genes. The prognostic values of IRGs were evaluated by univariate Cox analysis, and 236 genes that were significantly related to the overall survival (OS) of patients were identified. The signaling pathways that play roles in the prognosis of IRGs were investigated by Gene Ontology (GO) and Kyoto Encyclopedia of Genes and Genomes (KEGG) analyses, and the expression profiles of IRGs and OS in 499 HNSCC patients based on TCGA dataset were integrated. Potential molecular mechanisms and characteristics of these HNSCC-specific IRGs were further explored with the help of a new prognostic index based on IRGs developed by least absolute shrinkage and selection operator (LASSO) Cox analysis. A total of 64 hub genes (IRGs associated with prognosis) were markedly associated with the clinical outcome of HNSCC patients. KEGG functional enrichment analysis revealed that these genes were actively involved in several pathways, e.g., cytokine-cytokine receptor interaction, T-cell receptor signaling, and natural killer cell-mediated cytotoxicity. IRG-based prognostic signatures performed moderately in prognostic predictions. Interestingly, the prognostic index based on IRGs reflected infiltration by several types of immune cells. These data screened several IRGs of clinical significance and revealed drivers of the immune repertoire, demonstrating the importance of a personalized IRG-based immune signature in the recognition, surveillance, and prognosis of HNSCC.", "School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Department of Head and Neck Oncology, The Affiliated Hospital of Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Biology and Medical Engineering, Immune Cells and Antibody Engineering Research Center of Guizhou Province, School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Department of Head and Neck Oncology, The Affiliated Hospital of Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Department of Head and Neck Oncology, The Affiliated Hospital of Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Department of Intervention, The Affiliated Hospital of Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Basic Medical Sciences, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.School of Biology and Engineering, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Infectious Immune and Antibody Engineering in Guizhou Province, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China.Key Laboratory of Environmental Pollution Monitoring and Disease Control, Ministry of Education, Guizhou Medical University, Guiyang, China."], "33333830": ["A New Landscape for Systemic Pharmacotherapy of Recurrent Glioblastoma?", "Glioblastoma is the most common and aggressive primary malignant brain tumor in adult patients [...].", "Department of Oncology, Oncology 1, Veneto Institute of Oncology IOV-IRCCS, via Gattamelata 54, 35128 Padua, Italy.Sorbonne Universit\u00e9, Inserm, CNRS, UMR S 1127, Institut du Cerveau, ICM, AP-HP, H\u00f4pitaux Universitaires La Piti\u00e9 Salp\u00eatri\u00e8re - Charles Foix, Service de Neurologie 2-Mazarin, F-75013 Paris, France.Department of Neurology, University Hospital and University of Zurich, Frauenklinikstrasse 26, 8091 Zurich, Switzerland.Division of Oncology, Department of Medicine I, Medical University of Vienna, Waehringer Guertel 18-20, 1090 Vienna, Austria.Department of Oncology, Oncology 1, Veneto Institute of Oncology IOV-IRCCS, via Gattamelata 54, 35128 Padua, Italy.Department of Neurology, Erasmus University Medical Center, Doctor Molewaterplein 40, 3015 GD Rotterdam, The Netherlands."], "33335272": ["Metagenomic characterisation of additional and novel avian viruses from Australian wild ducks.", "Birds, notably wild ducks, are reservoirs of pathogenic and zoonotic viruses such as influenza viruses and coronaviruses. In the current study, we used metagenomics to detect and characterise avian DNA and RNA viruses from wild Pacific black ducks, Chestnut teals and Grey teals collected at different time points from a single location. We characterised a likely new species of duck aviadenovirus and a novel duck gyrovirus. We also report what, to the best of our knowledge, is the first finding of an avian orthoreovirus from Pacific black ducks and a rotavirus F from Chestnut teals. Other viruses characterised from the samples from these wild ducks belong to the virus families Astroviridae, Caliciviridae and Coronaviridae. Some of the viruses may have potential cross-species transmissibility, while others indicated a wide genetic diversity of duck viruses within a genus. The study also showed evidence of potential transmission of viruses along the East Asian-Australasian Flyway; potentially facilitated by migrating shorebirds. The detection and characterisation of several avian viruses not previously described, and causing asymptomatic but potentially also symptomatic infections suggest the need for more virus surveillance studies for pathogenic and potential zoonotic viruses in wildlife reservoirs.", "Geelong Centre for Emerging Infectious Diseases, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia. jessyatall@gmail.com.School of Medicine, Deakin University, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia. jessyatall@gmail.com.Geelong Centre for Emerging Infectious Diseases, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia.School of Medicine, Deakin University, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia.Centre for Integrative Ecology, Deakin University, Waurn Ponds, VIC, 3216, Australia.Geelong Centre for Emerging Infectious Diseases, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia. soren.alexandersen@deakin.edu.au.School of Medicine, Deakin University, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia. soren.alexandersen@deakin.edu.au.Barwon Health, Geelong, VIC, 3220, Australia. soren.alexandersen@deakin.edu.au."], "33339404": ["Update on Chemotherapeutic Approaches and Management of Bevacizumab Usage for Glioblastoma.", "Glioblastoma, the most common primary brain tumor in adults, has one of the most dismal prognoses in cancer. In 2009, bevacizumab was approved for recurrent glioblastoma in the USA. To evaluate the clinical impact of bevacizumab as a first-line drug for glioblastoma, two randomized clinical trials, AVAglio and RTOG 0825, were performed. Bevacizumab was found to improve progression-free survival (PFS) and was reported to be beneficial for maintaining patient performance status as an initial treatment. These outcomes led to bevacizumab approval in Japan in 2013 as an insurance-covered first-line drug for glioblastoma concurrently with its second-line application. However, prolongation of overall survival was not evinced in these clinical trials; hence, the clinical benefit of bevacizumab for newly diagnosed glioblastomas remains controversial. A recent meta-analysis of randomized controlled trials of bevacizumab combined with temozolomide in recurrent glioblastoma also showed an effect only on PFS, and the benefit of bevacizumab even for recurrent glioblastoma is controversial. Here, we discuss the clinical impact of bevacizumab for glioblastoma treatment by reviewing previous clinical trials and real-world evidence by focusing on Japanese experiences. Moreover, the efficacy and safety of bevacizumab are summarized, and we provide suggestions for updating the approaches and management of bevacizumab.", "Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan.Department of Neurosurgery, Graduate School of Medical Sciences, Kyushu University 3-1-1 Maidashi, Higashi-Ku, Fukuoka 812-8582, Japan."], "33353183": ["Flea Communities on Small Rodents in Eastern Poland.", "Fleas are hematophagous insects infesting mainly small mammals and, less frequently, birds. With their wide range of potential hosts, fleas play a significant role in the circulation of pathogens in nature. Depending on the species, they can be vectors for viruses, bacteria, rickettsiae, and protozoa and a host for some larval forms of tapeworm species. The aim of this study was to determine the species composition of fleas and their small rodent host preferences in eastern Poland. Animals were captured in traps in various types of ecological habitats (a site covered by grassland vegetation within city limits, an unused agricultural meadow, and a fallow land near a mixed forest). The following rodent species were caught: ", "Chair and Department of Biology and Parasitology, Medical University of Lublin, Radziwi\u0142\u0142owska 11 St., 20-080 Lublin, Poland.Chair and Department of Biology and Parasitology, Medical University of Lublin, Radziwi\u0142\u0142owska 11 St., 20-080 Lublin, Poland.Chair and Department of Biology and Parasitology, Medical University of Lublin, Radziwi\u0142\u0142owska 11 St., 20-080 Lublin, Poland."], "33381271": ["Nomogram to Predict Poor Outcome after Mechanical Thrombectomy at Older Age and Histological Analysis of Thrombus Composition.", "An easy scoring system to predict the risk of poor outcome after mechanical thrombectomy among the elderly is currently not available. Therefore, we aimed to develop a nomogram for predicting the probability of negative prognosis in aged patients with acute ischemic stroke undergoing thrombectomy. In addition, we sought to investigate the association between histological thrombus composition and stroke characteristics. To this end, we prospectively studied a developed cohort using data collected from a stroke center from November 2015 to December 2019. The main outcome was functional independence, defined as a modified Rankin\u2009Scale\u2009score \u2264 2 at 90 days following a mechanical thrombectomy. A nomogram model based on multivariate logistic models was generated. The retrieved thrombi were stained with hematoxylin and eosin and assessed according to histological composition. Our results demonstrated that age \u2265 72\u2009years was independently associated with poor outcome. A total of 304 participants completed the follow-up data to generate the nomogram model. After multivariate logistic regression, five variables remained independent predictors of outcome, including older age, hemorrhagic transformation, thrombolysis in cerebral infarction score, National Institute of Health Stroke score, and neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio, and were used to generate the nomogram. The area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve of the model was 0.803. The clots from elderly subjects with large-artery atherosclerosis, anterior circulation, and successful recanalization groups had a higher percentage of fibrin compared to those of younger patients. This is the first nomogram to be developed and validated in a stroke center cohort for individualized prediction of poor outcome in elderly patients after mechanical thrombectomy. Clot composition provides valuable information on the underlying pathogenesis of oxidation in older patients.", "Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurosurgery, Binhai People's Hospital, Jiangsu Province, China.Department of Neurosurgery, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurosurgery, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurosurgery, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurosurgery, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China.Department of Neurology, Shanghai Tenth People's Hospital, Tongji University, Shanghai 200072, China."], "33396491": ["Molecular Survey of Vector-Borne Pathogens of Dogs and Cats in Two Regions of Saudi Arabia.", "Dogs and cats play an important role as reservoirs of vector-borne pathogens, yet reports of canine and feline vector-borne diseases in Saudi Arabia are scarce. Blood samples were collected from 188 free-roaming dogs and cats in Asir (70 dogs and 44 cats) and Riyadh (74 dogs), Saudi Arabia. The presence of ", "Department of Biological Sciences, Faculty of Science and Humanities, Shaqra University, P.O. Box 1040, Ad-Dawadimi 11911, Saudi Arabia.King Abdulaziz City for Science and Technology, Riyadh 12354, Saudi Arabia.Department of Zoology, College of Science, King Saud University, P.O. Box 2455, Riyadh 11451, Saudi Arabia.Department of Clinical Laboratory Sciences, College of Applied Medical Science, King Khalid University, P.O. Box 61413, Abha 9088, Saudi Arabia.Department of Parasitology and Animal Diseases, Veterinary Research Division, National Research Centre, 33 Bohouth St., Dokki, 12622 Giza, Egypt.Department of Parasitology and Animal Diseases, Veterinary Research Division, National Research Centre, 33 Bohouth St., Dokki, 12622 Giza, Egypt.Veterinary Pathology Diagnostic Services, Sydney School of Veterinary Science, Faculty of Science, The University of Sydney, Sydney, New South Wales 2006, Australia.Department of Food Hygiene and Public Health, School of Veterinary Medicine, Shiraz University, Shiraz 7144169155, Iran.Department of Pathobiology, Faculty of Veterinary Science, Bu-Ali Sina University, Hamedan 6517658978, Iran.Zoonotic Diseases Research Center, School of Public Health, Shahid Sadoughi University of Medical Sciences, 8915173160 Yazd, Iran.Department of Pathobiology, Faculty of Veterinary Science, Bu-Ali Sina University, Hamedan 6517658978, Iran.Department of Veterinary Medicine, University of Bari, 70010 Bari, Italy."], "33407813": ["Patterns of flea infestation in rodents and insectivores from intensified agro-ecosystems, Northwest Spain.", "Fleas frequently infest small mammals and play important vectoring roles in the epidemiology of (re)emerging zoonotic disease. Rodent outbreaks in intensified agro-ecosystems of North-West Spain have been recently linked to periodic zoonotic diseases spillover to local human populations. Obtaining qualitative and quantitative information about the composition and structure of the whole flea and small mammal host coexisting communities is paramount to understand disease transmission cycles and to elucidate the disease-vectoring role of flea species. The aims of this research were to: (i) characterise and quantify the flea community parasiting a small mammal guild in intensive farmlands in North-West Spain; (ii) determine and evaluate patterns of co-infection and the variables that may influence parasitological parameters.We conducted a large-scale survey stratified by season and habitat of fleas parasitizing the small mammal host guild. We report on the prevalence, mean intensity, and mean abundance of flea species parasitizing Microtus arvalis, Apodemus sylvaticus, Mus spretus and Crocidura russula. We also report on aggregation patterns (variance-to-mean ratio and discrepancy index) and co-infection of hosts by different flea species (Fager index) and used generalized linear mixed models to study flea parameter variation according to season, habitat and host sex.Three flea species dominated the system: Ctenophthalmus apertus gilcolladoi, Leptopsylla taschenbergi and Nosopsyllus fasciatus. Results showed a high aggregation pattern of fleas in all hosts. All host species in the guild shared C. a. gilcolladoi and N. fasciatus, but L. taschenbergi mainly parasitized mice (M. spretus and A. sylvaticus). We found significant male-biased infestation patterns in mice, seasonal variations in flea abundances for all rodent hosts (M. arvalis, M. spretus and A. sylvaticus), and relatively lower infestation values for voles inhabiting alfalfas. Simultaneous co-infections occurred in a third of all hosts, and N. fasciatus was the most common flea co-infecting small mammal hosts.The generalist N. fasciatus and C. a. gilcolladoi dominated the flea community, and a high percentage of co-infections with both species occurred within the small mammal guild. Nosopsyllus fasciatus may show higher competence of inter-specific transmission, and future research should unravel its role in the circulation of rodent-borne zoonoses.", "Dpto. Ciencias Agroforestales, ETSIIAA, Universidad de Valladolid, Avda. de Madrid 44, 34004, Palencia, Spain. silvia.herrero.cofreces@uva.es.Instituto Universitario de Investigaci\u00f3n en Gesti\u00f3n Forestal Sostenible, Palencia, Spain. silvia.herrero.cofreces@uva.es.Dpto. Ciencias Agroforestales, ETSIIAA, Universidad de Valladolid, Avda. de Madrid 44, 34004, Palencia, Spain.Dpto. Biolog\u00eda Animal (Zoolog\u00eda), Universidad de Salamanca, Campus Unamuno S/N, 37007, Salamanca, Spain.Dpto. Ciencias Agroforestales, ETSIIAA, Universidad de Valladolid, Avda. de Madrid 44, 34004, Palencia, Spain.Instituto Universitario de Investigaci\u00f3n en Gesti\u00f3n Forestal Sostenible, Palencia, Spain.Dpto. Ciencias Agroforestales, ETSIIAA, Universidad de Valladolid, Avda. de Madrid 44, 34004, Palencia, Spain.Instituto Universitario de Investigaci\u00f3n en Gesti\u00f3n Forestal Sostenible, Palencia, Spain.Instituto de Investigaci\u00f3n en Recursos Cineg\u00e9ticos, IREC (CSIC-UCLM-JCCM), Ronda de Toledo s/n, 13071, Ciudad Real, Spain."], "33455579": ["Evaluation of hematological alteration of vector-borne pathogens in cats from Bangkok, Thailand.", "Cats can be carriers of infected arthropods and be infected with several vector-borne pathogens (VBPs) but there is limited knowledge about their pathogenic role in cats. This study aimed to assess the prevalence of some feline vector-borne agents by molecular technique and to characterize the hematological findings associated with these infections in a cat population from Bangkok Thailand.PCR was positive with at least one pathogen in 237 out of 372 subjects (63.7%), with prevalence of 39.5% (147/372) for Babesia spp., 36.9% (137/372) for hemoplasmas and 3.2% (12/372) for Hepatozoon spp. The cats older than 1 year were at significantly greater risk for VBPs infection (P = 0.001; OR = 1.43; 95% CI: 1.12 - 1.81) and hemoplasmas infection (\u03c72 = 10.8, df = 1; P < 0.0001; OR = 2.45; 95% CI: 1.49 - 4.01). A significant association between hematological findings and hemoplasma infection were identified in the present study. Besides, VBPs infection revealed more frequent in male cats (\u03c72= 6.38, df = 1, P = 0.01). Macrocytic hypochromic type of anemia was observed in cats infested with blood-sucking arthropods compared to the non-infested cats presented.The current study confirmed that Babesia, Hepatozoon and hemoplasmas had infected semi-domesticated cats in Bangkok, Thailand, with Babesia and hemoplasmas being dominant in prevalence. Some hematological findings were significantly associated with cats infected with vector-borne pathogens in this study including leukocyte count and platelets count that may help support veterinary technicians in diagnosis and appropriate treatment. Campaigns of VBPs monitoring in Bangkok emphasizing on the investigation of vectors and\u00a0possible routes of the infection in animals should be conducted to prevent the transmission of the pathogens.", "Department of Parasitology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Kasetsart University, 10900, Bangkok, Thailand.Department of Parasitology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Kasetsart University, 10900, Bangkok, Thailand.Department of Parasitology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Kasetsart University, 10900, Bangkok, Thailand.Department of Parasitology, Faculty of Veterinary Medicine, Kasetsart University, 10900, Bangkok, Thailand. tawin.i@ku.th."], "33474517": ["Adherence to smoke-free policies in Ghana: Findings from a cross-sectional survey of hospitality venue owners and staff.", "Implementation of and compliance with smoke-free policies (SFPs) can be problematic in many low- and middle-income countries (LMICs) due to limited resources. This study evaluated knowledge, opinions and compliance related to Ghana's SFPs among owners and staff of hospitality venues by city, staff designation, and venue type.A cross-sectional study design was used in venue types including hotels, bars, pubs and restaurants in the three cities of Kumasi, Accra, and Tamale, in Ghana.Data were collected between July and September 2019. Interviewer administered face-to-face surveys were conducted with owners and staff (n=142) recruited from randomly selected hospitality venues (n=154) in these three large cities of Ghana. The relationship between knowledge, opinions, and compliance items on SFPs, and city, venue type and staff designation was first studied using \u03c7Of the 142 respondents, some had heard of Ghana's 2012 Tobacco Control Act (27.5%), smoking restriction in public places (29%), smoke-free places (22%), and display of 'no smoking' signage (6.3%). Knowledge levels were higher in Accra compared to Tamale (OR=3.08; 95% CI: 1.10-8.60). Staff designation and type of venue did not have any relationship with knowledge levels. Support for SFPs was over 80%, but opinions in support of SFPs were lower in Accra than Tamale (OR=0.25; 95% CI: 0.08-0.71). Compliance with SFPs was similar in the three cities. Hotels were three times more compliant compared to bars and pubs (OR=3.16; 95% CI: 1.48-6.71).The study highlights the strong support for restriction of smoking in public places including hospitality venues despite poor knowledge and low compliance levels with the current SFPs. A review of the current SFP in Ghana together with education of hospitality staff on the benefits and requirements of SFPs is recommended.", "School of Public Health, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.Usher Institute, University of Edinburgh, Edinburgh, United Kingdom.Faculty of Social Sciences (Health Sciences), Tampere University, Tampere, Finland.African Centre for Clean Air, Kampala, Uganda.Institute for Social Marketing and Health, University of Stirling, Stirling, United Kingdom.School of Public Health, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.Ghana Health Service, Research and Development Division, Accra, Ghana.School of Public Health, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana.King's College London, London, United Kingdom.University of Nottingham, Nottingham, United Kingdom.Usher Institute, University of Edinburgh, Edinburgh, United Kingdom.School of Public Health, Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi, Ghana."]}